 June 2021
Friday, June 25, 2021 at 6:30 AM (GMT+1)
First diary entry. Tbh I’m Lowkey just doing this cause I feel like there’s no one I can be truly honest with, and it’s been a while since I’ve just let go. Today was the last day at accommodation, and the last day of the first year of imperial. It’s 6 am and I’ve been chilling in the b204 kitchen with the people from the floor above for the whole night - weirdly similar to how we did the exact same thing on the first day of accommodation... weird full circle...I feel a bit weird right now, I met some cool people I fuck with but I do kinda feel like I could have made better use of my time here, especially girl wise. I went to multiple rave kitchen parties today (covid lol) and saw a really cute girl talking to a Portuguese girl I fw from the floor below but I didn’t even say a word to her... pissed because that kinda sums up my biggest struggle right now. I know what I want and know what to do but something inside me is holding me back, almost as if it doesn’t want me to fuck or get in a relationship with a girl... I really wanted to lose this pussy behavior by going to camp in the US, and I should have been there since last week if it wasn’t for this shit travel ban. I’m sad because I feel like right now I’m being complacent with my girl situation. No one knows this but I haven’t made out with a girl since March 2020. The worst part is that I’ve had sooo many chances but I just fumble it over and over and over again. Being in the US surrounded by people my age that would be fucking like rabbits and doing activities that build self confidence every day was my perfect solution to the problem but now that it’s not happening I’m scared I’m going to continue being a virgin that almost purposely fumbles every opportunity for the rest of my life. I had the opportunity with Esha, who’s not really hot or my type at all, but I did feel a bit attracted to but it’s just that I have mixed feelings about this shit when it gets to the moment. Not even to mention the time with Mencia when I fucking slept over in her room and didn’t even make out - even she said herself I was the first guy that slept over and didn’t fuck.
I thought the whole point of game was to make sure I wouldn’t get these shitty experiences anymore but all it has done is make me super cocky and peacocking with my blonde hair, gold chain, rings and shit. Tbh I know that it works to get girls attracted, I can feel them being attracted to me - or atleast seeing potential for them to become attracted - but then I just don’t know how to progress.
I want to learn the routines and all that shit to make sure I’m able to figure out how to handle those situations, but I feel like until I’m able to approach a random ass girl with confidence without having to be drunk it’s gonna be fucking useless to learn these techniques, especially if I never get to apply them.
So overall, I don’t fucking know what to do with my life at this point. I’m taking a shit right now while writing this and I still have to pack my bags for my fight back to Portugal in a couple of hours. I don’t like my course (tbh I do think I passed tho), my girl situation here is total shit imo, and although i met loads of people, I only really found a very very few set of people that I’m able to vibe with... of those which I met like a month ago.
Right now I’m hoping summer is going to be good, despite not feeling super confident about it. I really want to fuck someone, I feel like that is the main thing that’s holding me back from approaching other girls - the thought that I’m just a fraud. Someone with lots of experience yet no experience. And I feel like until I’m able to actually fuck and walk the talk, I won’t be able to grow as a person.
So that’s where I’m at right now. Kinda fucked but i know I could be dealing with much worse things right now. I hope that I continue writing these entries, that feel like I’m getting shjt off my chest and thinking about it.
I want to write so much more now that I’ve started but hopefully I’ll continue writing regularly from now on.
Saturday, June 26, 2021 at 12:48 AM (GMT+1)
Just came back to Lisbon today from london. There are a shit kid of renovations going on and I have so much dust on my feet rn. It was a pretty decent and uneventful day. I’m really just writing this because I want to get into the habit of writing everyday.
Today I posted a pic on my Instagram and I got very little likes. I feel like I give less of a shit if I get many likes or not compared to a couple of years ago when I felt like my value would be determined by the number of likes I would get. That being said I’m conscious about the fact that I’m always refreshing my feed and profile over and over, this shit is toxic af. I lowkey wish I could just throw away my phone for the whole summer and detox myself but it would then be impossible to make plans and talk to people... fuck it I guess
Speaking of plans, I’m starting to think about what kind of shit I wanna do this summer. As of right now my only plan is to go to slovakia - I want to hook up with Linda k and Sima, as well as spend enough time with Linda B and Laura so that we can room together next year.
It’s kinda tough right now because Linda’s saying Laura doesn’t really feel comfortable with staying with a guy, but I feel like it’s more just because we don’t know each other well enough. If we don’t end up rooming together, which it’s starting to look like so, I’m gonna be with few choices and I’m worried I’m gonna have to stay with people I don’t fw and are gonna be dead vibes.
But yeah it hasn’t been a bad day, I just want to make sure I don’t get into the trap of staying at home in fucking cadafais for the whole summer, I need
      1

 to start making plans and putting myself out there if I want to have fun.
    Sunday, June 27, 2021 at 11:24 PM (GMT+1)
Boring day. Weekends here in Lisbon rn mean that you can’t leave your city so I can’t go see anyone - well if I’m gonna be honest I hadn’t planned to go see anyone yet. I need to get on my ass and make some plans.
I find myself really bored during the day and end up scrolling through Instagram so much it’s such a waste of time. I just searched up “productive things to do when bored” because I feel like I want to do something that’s going to help me in the future now that I have free time, like business ideas and useful skills and shit but I can’t.
I’m probably just gonna spend time on game, at least that’s gonna be more useful than scratching my balls all day.
In other notes, Portugal lost against Belgium 0-1 today so they’re eliminated from the euros. It was a shit game that we deserved but there’s nothing really to do, I can just imagine how much sadder it must feel as a player to know that you lost a match that you played so much better than the opponent. I guess that’s kinda like life tho if im gonna be deep about it. U can do everything well and still get fucked.
Anyways, im about to read up on this new book called ‘Models’ about inner game. Not sure if that’s what I need but I’ve been reading that it introduces some useful stuff on how to start approaching girls without even thinking about it. That’s lowkey what I feel like I need - I still see a hot girl and wait out way too long on approaching, which almost always ends up with me fucking it up and losing the moment. I wish I could just get the balls to put myself out there and face enough rejections so that I become desensitized to it. The thing is I don’t know how I can go about doing it, just thinking about it makes me feel a bit embarrassed.
I texted Lucas today, we’re talking about doing some shit this upcoming week. I hope this ends up going through, I need to spend enough time with him so it will become natural to become roommates if the shit with Linda doesn’t work out.
End of June 2021
  2

 July 2021
Friday, July 2, 2021 at 11:28 PM (GMT+1)
It’s been a couple of days. I have been trying to do these everyday but I never give myself time during the evening. The last 5 days have been eventful as fuck. I crashed pedros car against a fucking wall cause a bus merged and I didn’t honk or brake in time... 700 eur in damages. My dad bought another C1 for the “family” because I don’t have any cars to drive and allow me to leave this house.
I’ve gone out a couple of days with the Brazilian guys from st Nicholas, I really had fun and hope I can keep on doing those hangouts - they’re super chill and I missed that kind of fun presence in my life, especially the part that they’re also always trying to get girls.
That being said I haven’t done much more than that. I really want to do some shit that’s gonna help me become the person I want to be in the future now that I have time but I don’t know what to do. I want to get some DJ gigs or jobs during the summer - just to put myself outside my comfort zone and do something I consider fun and cool. Maybe I’m going to design a website promoting me and start applying to jobs around Europe for the summer.
I haven’t really been talking to girls recently, and that’s kinda fucking me up. I don’t have any solid girls here in Lisbon rn, especially after all that Lea fumble shit. I sent Sima a snap a couple of days ago mentioning that I crashed just to start a convo but she didn’t send a snap back. Today she posted a pic on her insta and a guy commented, and she just posted a story with the same guy grabbing her by the waist. I honestly don’t know why I’m feeling possessive and jealous about her; we don’t even ducking see each other. Maybe it’s the fact that we could have had something but she found someone else while I didn’t?
To be honest I don’t even know if they are a thing or not, but this makes it even less enticing to go to slovakia this summer.
Another thing that’s slowly creeping my thoughts is the accommodation situation for next year... it’s getting later and later and I haven’t confirmed staying with anyone. The linda and Laura shit isn’t looking good at all even though it’s my favourite option. I’ve been spending time with Lucas and shit but I haven’t brought it up. Next time I see him I want to make sure I atleast mention it.
I don’t want to be fucked next year staying with random people I don’t like
Monday, July 5, 2021 at 3:00 AM (GMT+1)
I don’t know how to start these shits. Today was an alright day, we went to have lunch near Torres vedras and I DJd for a bit outside. To be honest now that I’m saying it out loud it was kinda boring. What’s been going through my mind a lot lately is the fact that I don’t have any close friends right now, other than Omar and Mohamed. And I don’t mean best friends, I just mean people I can randomly call and there wouldn’t have to be a reason for calling. I want to travel to bratislava but I’m afraid it’s going to be boring and I won’t have friends to go out with. To be honest I can stay with the barbiers like usual and maybe we can do some shit, and since this is me speaking to myself I can be honest, maybe I’ll have a chance with Elise to do something. But I’m kinda frustrated in a way because I don’t know who to hit up, I feel like I’m not close with anybody really. Honesty I think I’m just over reacting and I should just stop giving a shit and just go. Get a car and worst case I’ll go visit prague and other places.
I haven’t gone out with friends in a couple of days and it’s starting to fuck with me. The worst part is that I don’t have concrete plans for the upcoming future. I’ll hit up Bernardo in the morning and arranje something.
Other than that, I’ve almost finished my DJ CV and I think tomorrow I’m going to start sending it out to a bunch of different applications around Europe. I want to explore new shit and be spontaneous. To be honest I’ve been thinking more and more about dropping out of university. I find the shit I study so boring and the university is so unlike me... I don’t even know. My parents would be pissed I can just tell and they’d think I’d just be throwing my life away. That’s why I think that if I have a solid plan they’ll be more likely to understand
Monday, July 19, 2021 at 3:25 PM (GMT+1)
So it’s been quite a while since I last wrote anything here. I don’t really know why I don’t write more. Currently im on the plane back from Bratislava where I just spent the weekend. I had lots of fun there - 4 days is the perfect length. I was barely ever alone the whole time. On the first day we had a barbecue at victors place, we invited like 12 people and it was really amazing to talk with the people that I used to see everyday. I love this tradition. On the second day we went clubbing in trafo. I got super fucking wasted and pissed in the fountain. The only regret that night was that I didn’t talk enough to girls. There was ester and Mia that I could have done sooo much more. What pisses me off is that I spent so much time reading those PUA books so that I would know exactly what to do in those situations. This is the same thing that happened last night when I was with Linda K going on a roadtrip. I knew that I could get her if I did the right things / routines. But I just didn’t know what to do in the moment, so we just ended up talking, we barely had any Kino. I need to have better game plans to fall back on in situations like that. Because I really didn’t know where I was heading with the situation. Either ways, I do honestly feel like a bit of a jacksaw cause I was with sima out in a date during the day and with her sister at night. And obviously I know this won’t go on for very long if I try to keep balancing the two sisters like this, and I’m going to end up having both girls hating me... so maybe it was a good thing that nothing happened between me and Linda, despite at the moment me being completely disappointed about it.
I also had edibles on Saturday with viktor and Alem. First of all, fuck that red velvet cake edible we made in London. It basically fucked me up for all future edibles. I literally couldn’t eat the brownies without gagging, my body just became so sick of the smell of cooked weed in cake I felt repulsed.
          3

 Either ways I forced myself to eat it and we got soooo high. It was a really good high. I laughed so much, we talked, and I never felt paranoid or sad or depressed. I remember us just blankly staring at the DVD menu page for half an hour cause we couldn’t get netflix to work.
Overall, the trip was fun. It is just so frustrating I didn’t kiss anyone. The longer this drought lasts the more self conscious I get about it. But the problem is that I’m also not making effort to change anything. It’s like I’m in standby waiting for someone else to make the move...
End of July 2021
  4

 March 2022
Sunday, March 6, 2022 at 12:55 AM (GMT)
It’s been a really long time since I’ve written anything and for some reason I feel like I want to do one of these. This weekend and in general everything that happened since last time I wrote one of these diaries has been so crazy. Without holding anything back I know I’m gonna sound so corny but it is what it is. I finally fucked, honestly I think I’m better than I expected to be, first Laura and second Andrea, I’m a bit relieved I guess but since happening it’s not a big deal, I don’t hold any pressure under sex anymore and I think this is what I wanted to feel the whole time. I honestly feel like I’ve been happier person since last time I wrote this. Somehow I’ve been able to balance a party lifestyle while still being able to pass my courses. I’ve accepted that I don’t like my course but I’ll finish this shit. Next year I think will be easier and more tailored towards me and so that keeps me a bit motivated. Now there’s so much shit to say I don’t have the time or patience to write it all so I’ll jump to this weekend.
For the second time I did ecstasy. I bought it for the first time as well which was a bit of a step forward but I bought all the purity tests to make sure I got something good, I think that was the smartest thing I did because the whole time I was buzzing I knew in the back of my mind the thing I took was pure and everything would be great.
I took it with Pepe and Lucka and went to fabric. Crazy shit. We took it in the line and by the time we got through all the queues me and lucka somewhat split from the rest of our group and I’m not joking those 30 minutes (I think that was how long) me and her were wandering around and dancing and meeting people were the best 30 minutes of my life. I couldn’t stop smiling. Me and her were holding each other by our sides and just vibing like crazy. There wasn’t that much sexual desire for her on my part which I was surprised but also happy because I could just focus on enjoying the night. I was so happy some guy stopped me while we were walking in the crowd and said “you look so gassed, I fucking love it”
That shit is amazing
The rest of the night was good, but obviously as time went on and the effects started to fade it got a bit more boring, all the dopamine was depleted and shit. It hit lucka the worst, she just got bored and looked a little out of it. It’s a shame because it kinda killed my vibe as well. That’s why next time we have to have a bigger group of people doing it because it’s that energy that keeps the effect going.
Nonetheless, I felt a bit of morning depression. Don’t think it was anything special just felt like last night was so amazing that The morning just felt a bit shit, but I guess that’s the price you pay.
I think it’s a great drug if you do it in the right place with the right people, I’m gonna limit myself to only doing it once every 2 months because if you start getting used to feeling that good I feel like it’s gonna be a very dangerous rabbit hole. Need to try that shit with Pedro and his friends, since they’re so much more experienced I can just imagine it must be so good. I’m guessing with a big enough group we could turn it into a tradition every X months we go to ministry on E, and then come back to our place and everyone crashes there. That was the biggest thing that didn’t happen yesterday. Lucka initially was meant to stay at ours but as she became more bored and less euphoric she decided to go home, I don’t think it was good on her part but at the same time I have to respect it. But I remember doing it with Lucas and the thing I loved the most was the walk home from ministry with all the other like 6 people that we went with and we all just went back to Lucas’s house and smoked a j as the sun came up. I think that’s the best way to end the night, big group, walk home (not taxi) and a J while sitting outside.
I wanna do it again soon, but with new people as well. I got worried for a bit because Pepe loved it so much he kept on saying we have to do this next week and shit and I was like fuuuuck this guy might get addicted. Since I have the dealer only I guess I get to kind of make sure he doesn’t fall down that path.
I really wanna try it with Juli, that shit must be crazy there as well. I really vibed with her when I went to Paris. I had a bit of an agenda to sleep with her which I guess fucked me up but I think she also Lowkey wanted it but the conditions just weren’t right. I wanna go paris again to meet her friends and have some fun there I feel like I would love it. I don’t know if I could be able to smash I feel like my brain is now fucked up with her but I guess I could pop a viagra and that will fix the psychological issues. But more than that I miss having a girl I emotionally connect with. I thought it would be Linda but shit didn’t go according to plan so that’s a suspended story for now. Juli is also a girl I couldnt see myself with for a long time, even if we lived in the same city. I would much rather her being a friend with benefits that we could go on trips together and have so much fun, but the commitment I think always fucks it.
I wanna have a girlfriend for the first time in a long time. Now that I’ve done hookups I see that there’s a bit of emptiness when you guys leave. I haven’t cuddled in so long that’s the shit I miss. The comfort of being with someone beautiful and fun next to you while u guys just speak about life. Thing is I don’t know how to find someone like that. Within my close circle I don’t meet new people very often. Being with the Slovaks kinda limits you
  5

 to the same people all the time which is dead. That’s why next year I wanna live with Lucas and kings people. Need to meet new people. I don’t wanna bitch here because I’m in a pretty good mood but I just think it’s not healthy the habits the other guys here have, and just by living with them it dissipates to me. So I have to leave. It’s a bit tough because I know that it will change the dynamics for next year but I need to be a bit selfish here for my sake. These guys have no ambition or motivation and I’m the opposite of that. It will also mean I might have to pay more next year, but honesty I don’t care too much my income is pretty steady, I have at the moment around 3k pounds in emergency funds plus like 3k in spending accounts and more in crypto stocks and debt from Pepe. I feel financially secure but I realized I need to relax on my spending. Emergency funds really helped me with that, if I move 80% of my money there and I see my balance at 500 I know I can’t exceed that. I spent around 100 this weekend which is chill cause I made around 200 from tutoring so it works out but I don’t have the mentality of breaking even I want to accumulate money so I can start pursuing my passions and investing in shit. I feel like I know I’m gonna be successful. This summer in the US will really help me with the social aspect. I feel a bit more shy than I once was and my game is complete shit. Even though people think I have good game I think it’s very average. Being in the us and having to be the goofy funny one for 2-3 months I think will re-wire my brain and will give me so many new skills I will use in so many areas. I’m super excited for that.
Anyways, I’ve been writing a shit ton, I haven’t mention a bunch of things, like going into depth about Linda but that’s just cause I don’t feel like thinking about her. I know she probably has a guy now so it’s gonna be pathetic asf on my side If I’m romanticizing about a girl that doesn’t even think of me. My goal is to be so successful and such a fun and interesting she’s going to want to be with me but I won’t want to be with her. That’s why I really do think the most important thing is to work on myself. I need to be someone I admire. Someone people are envious of. Someone who people are attracted to because their life is so fun and they’re such a good presence around them that it feels amazing to be with them. And to do that I need to put in the work. I need to send shit to clubs if I really wanna get my break with DJing, I need to work on my efficiency to do everything. I think that to do that I need to be surrounded by people that also want to be like that. Ideally I’d wanna live with Linda B and kings friends. Perfect balance of productivity and fun. But that’s not realistic so we go for the next best thing. Either ways that’s that. Shits looking good, I like where my life is heading. I just gotta make sure I take the right route.
Oh and PS Silvia and her new bf were also here this weekend and at fabric. Felt like shit is chill between me and her now, I don’t care too much about what happened in the past and I was happy I got to vibe with some new faces
End of March 2022
  6

 September 2022
Sunday, September 11, 2022 at 4:36 PM (GMT+2)
Hi
Like always, haven’t written here in a while but I’ve felt like i wanted to just kinda keep a record of what my head is thinking right now. I really want to look back in a couple of years and just have a better memory of what life was like before. Right now I’m on the plane from nice heading to Barcelona. Quite a lot of random shit here. I don’t even know where to start. Let me first kinda start by structuring how I’m going to go through this. First I’ll talk about Monaco then I’ll talk about sm and the work I’m about to do and the future.
So yeah I’ve just spent the weekend in Monaco with Linda. This is the second time I’ve done this and this time it was totally different. The first time I didn’t do anything with her and I just fell inlove with the experience. It was beautiful and I don’t think I have ever had since a better weekend of my life. This time I stayed for 2 days and even tho this time we hooked up it feels a lot different. Not in a bad way or in a good way. Just different. I felt a lot of closure now and we spoke a lot about our feelings childhood and all that shit. I love it because it’s like I get a weekend of what it’s like to be in a relationship. But the first time I came I basically developed a crush on linda. I’m not sure whether looking back I was just in love with the lifestyle I had the first weekend or if it really was her. But after this time I think it wasn’t me love. She’s a cool girl and I like spending time with her but I don’t think I could ever be with her in a relationship. We’re different people. There’s a lot of behaviors that you just think would make us incompatible. - quick break the cabin crew just stopped me cause they thought I was texting and that I didn’t have my flight mode on. Funny.-
Anyways back to what I was saying i think this trip made me realize a lot of stuff about myself and about how I want to be like in the future. I don’t know how to explain it in words but yeah
  7

      Tuesday, September 27, 2022 at 4:40 PM (GMT+3) funny stuff that happened today in Kuwait:
-girl in presentation apparently has been up for a week straight, but spent 3 hours on tiktok last night
- went to traditional Kuwait restaurant, only served a fork but I ordered meat so I had to eat using my hands
- got asked by group of Muslim girls of my astrology sign, then when I answered Scorpio, they got upset and left
- cars beep randomly at you as you’re walking for no reason, feels like they’re saying hi
- got told off for talking about having had a relationship
- got told off for extending my arm to shake a woman’s hand
- got a haircut by a cross-eyed Arabic guy that didn’t speak English- Lowkey top10 trims
- got same taxi driver twice two days in a row
- kids don’t give a fuck here, you ask them to move out the way and they stay still, girl just walked up to me grabbed my arm, looked at me, then let go
8

 and walked away
     Wednesday, September 28, 2022 at 5:12 PM (GMT+3) Laura kicking me out after hooking up in london
Funny things from today:
- Border patrol officer in Kuwait laughing at my name because it says Maria, he said “Joao Maria” while holding his laugh, then was super chill and liked me
- Telling students in presentation accidentally that I had a professional motorbike “racist” student when I meant racer...
- got a dodge challenger as a taxi today to the airport
9

    Thursday, September 29, 2022 at 5:35 PM (GMT+3)
- kid apparently sleeps 14 hours a day consistently, but if he takes caffeine then it’s the opposite and doesn’t sleep at all - kid admitted that he drives underage
  10

    End of September 2022
11

 October 2022
Saturday, October 1, 2022 at 6:18 PM (GMT+4)
- rented Tesla, called support because there were no keys and asked where they were. Spent 5 minutes answering security questions just for them to hit me with “yeah there’s our teslas have keys, you just use your phone”
- random kid in pool hears helicopter runs up to me and screams “helicopter!!!” In the most high pitched Persian accent
Tuesday, October 4, 2022 at 11:53 PM (GMT+4)
Funny things
- was driving like an animal, Indians in Abu Dhabi are so repressed I cut a guy off and instead of being kissed he was just like “come on man...”
- had 10 min to find a parking spot and fuel the tank before I had to pay extra fee for over renting the car
- airport Bahrain, I asked old Indian woman if seat next to her was free. Since then she comes up and starts talking in Hindi to me and blowing me kisses
Friday, October 7, 2022 at 2:54 PM (GMT+1)
6 tickets in Abu Dhabi, 4 speeding 1 unsafe driving and 1 running red light
... all while using Tomas’s drivers license
Got hit on by real estate agent responsible for my flat in Camden
Saturday, October 8, 2022 at 11:42 PM (GMT+1) Got police called on me for ding dong ditching, up to 14 days in prison
Sunday, October 16, 2022 at 2:53 PM (GMT+1)
This little girl just walked up to me and waved said some shit in Turkish then ran away in airplane
Talked for a long time with Pakistani man sitting next to me on the flight to Istanbul. We spoke about a lot and he seemed like a monk type personality, really accepting of everything and always positive and never speaking bad of anything. Then as the plane was descending there was turbulence and bro says “the beginning of the flight was really calm but now it’s very shaky” and I’m like yea there’s probably a bit of wind now, then he’s like “no I think it’s just it’s a bad pilot” then I don’t say anything back and with the most serious voice “...it’s probably a woman piloting”. Then bro went on a rant about women driving and how his wife said she wanted to be like one of those women bus drivers in London, and he’s like “of course I told her yes of course, but inside I was like... *shakes his head*
                      Monday, October 17, 2022 at 12:36 PM (GMT+3)
12

 Spoke for 2 hours with Istanbul taxi driver despite him not speaking enlgish and me no Turkish. Talked about everything and added each other on contacts
End of October 2022
  13

 December 2022
Sunday, December 25, 2022 at 11:29 PM (GMT)
Hoje vou fazer isto em português para talvez enviar para a mãe, hoje chegamos a casa do almoço com o pai e a família dele as 8:30 Pm e a mãe já estava no quarto, luz desligadas, e com cara que já estava a dormir. O Tomás bateu na porta dela e nada, depois eu bato logo depois e oiço movimento na cama e assumo que está lá, eu penso que depois ouvi a mãe a dizer “ah?” E eu digo que chegamos. Depois pergunto se ela está bem mas ela não falou alto e os cães estavam a fazer barulho então não ouvi dizer.
E muito triste e eu imagino quão triste ela deveria ter estado enquanto ela estava sozinha e nos no almoço. Por outro lado eu imagino que o pai estava muito triste ontem também, but he dealt with it. E muito difícil nesta altura porque eu sinto que a mãe está muito triste mas tem um taboo de falar sobre estas coisas. Eu não tenho a menor ideia do que aconteceu. A mãe nunca nem acknowledged que ela é o pai se separaram. Eu sei que é difícil para ela mas como mãe tem a responsabilidade de ter estas conversas dificieis connosco. Tal ela como o pai (mas menos) não entendem que a pior coisa é afastarem-se de nós por não falar sobre estas coisas. Eu tal como o Tomás ficamos mesmo frustrados e tristes por não saber a situação mas ter que lidar com as consequências. Eu sinceramente acho uma forma de abuso emotional incrivelmente injusto. Criar está dinâmica de don’t ask don’t tell e muito irritante e cada vez mais eu sinto-me mais perto de querer iniciar uma conversa sobre isso.
O problema eu acho e que esta dinâmica foi sempre assim desde faz muito tempo. Mesmo quando aconteceu aquele primeiro incidente em Paris, eles não disseram nada para nós e só houve uma tensão gigante na família. Eu não sei se eles pensam que nós não reparamos ou se são tão cobardes de dizer a verdade para os seus filhos e tratar eles com o mesmo nível de respeito que eles expect of us.
Eu acho que daqui a algumas paths para ir. Eu acho que a mãe está muito mais triste do que parece on the outside, e eu acho que nesta altura quando historicamente estamos sempre todos juntos, quando ela agora fica sozinha fica muito triste. Eu estou feliz que a mãe encontrou um trabalho que gosta e que tem bons amigos mas sinceramente eu não sei qual é a situação neste momento. Eu não sei se a mãe está a gostar da vida dela agora, eu não sei se a mãe está no meio duma depressão e está a esconder superficialmente enquanto nos estamos presentes. E eu sinto um grande amount de responsabilidade para make sure que não está assim secretly. O meu biggest fear e que um dia acontecer alguma coisa horrível por causa duma depressão que eu suspeitava mas nunca fiz nada para ajudar.
Mas por outro lado eu tenho medo de perguntar. Eu tenho medo da resposta. Não de saber se talvez o pai traiu outra vez ou se houve uma luta ou não sei que. Eu tenho medo de ver a mãe ou o pai a chorar. Eu não sei se eu consigo aconselhar eles. Eu acho que ja que nunca vi eles a chorar eu idealize eles como pessoas que não podem mostrar emoções, e então sempre que há um evento emotional na família eu sinto-me muita vontade de fugir para estar sozinho. Este ambiente emotional que foi criado acho extremamente negativo e acho que é a razão que nós todos temos que aprender a lidar com as situações difíceis todos sós. Sem ajuda, sem empatia, sem mostrar emoção.
Então para acabar este texto de hoje vou escrever um texto que talvez envie para a mãe, ou talvez de me coragem para falar diretamente com ela.
Olá mãe,
Eu sei que nunca tivemos uma conversa deste tipo na nossa vida, e por muito tempo sempre achei que era normal. Mas faz alguns anos eu comecei a ter mais perguntas e descobrir que este ambiente fechado emotional não é normal e está a causar muita frustração e tristeza na família.
Eu nunca falei de emoção contigo, ou com o pai ou o Pedro ou o Tomás, e acredito que também ninguém já falou de emoção com algum de nós. Nesta altura de férias em que eu vejo que tem uma presença de tristeza e segredes na casa eu sinto responsabilidade de ter a coragem para começar está conversa.
Mais do que uma conversa eu quero list todas as perguntas que eu sempre tive sobre a nossa família mas nunca consegui receber uma resposta. São coisas que eu nunca entendi porque são segredos e porque são taboos de falar em casa. Não vou por as perguntas em ordem de importância
- qual é a história do pai do Pedro? E porque nunca se fala sobre isto
- o que aconteceu com o pai e porque vocês acham certo de não incluir os vossos filhos na conversa?
- porque o teu lado da família tem tantos segredos? Porque não se fala da avó vitória?
- porque que tu é o pai nunca foram emocionais connosco? Vocês nunca disseram que vocês nos amam, e nunca falaram sobre emoções.
Eu não acho que vocês entendem que eu tal como o Tomás e o Pedro queremos saber sobre vocês. Eu acho muita muita pena e tristeza quando eu sei mais sobre a vida dos meus amigos mais que a vida dos meus pais.
Eu sei que algumas destas matérias são difíceis para falar mas isso não deveria significar que sempre deveriam ficar segredos.
Eu fico muito frustrado as vezes com isto. Frustrado que eu não consigo ter conversas importantes com ninguém da minha família. Que eu sento que eu não conheço sinceramente nenhum de vocês. E que quando tu ficas triste e fechaste no teu quarto eu não consigo ajudar e tenho que ficar triste e
  14

 culpado no meu quarto pelo o facto que tu nunca quiseste explicar para nós a razão que estás triste. E chato e frustrante e é uma coisa que eu quero que mude.
Eu estou me a cagar se tu é o pai voltem a viver juntos. Nunca me importei sobre isso na minha vida. Eu só quero que vocês estão felizes. E eu sei se vocês nunca explicarem a situação e só ficarem com isso dentro de vocês daí nunca vais conseguir overcome it.
Se tu quiseres estar com outro homem e o pai com outra mulher eu tenho certeza que nenhum de nós tem qualquer problema. Mas quando vocês não explicam a situação e vivem em mistério e segredos, é óbvio que nós vamos querer rejeitar essa ideia também.
Por favor. Para de tentar segurar tudo dentro de ti. Não há problema de falar as histórias. Nos podemos ajudar e fazer a nossa vida melhor, mas só dá se tu aceitares que nós merecemos o mesmo nível de respeito para ter estás conversas. O meu maior medo é vocês morrem e eu não saber nada sobre a vossa história.
estou muito interessado na tua história
  End of December 2022
15

 January 2023
Sunday, January 8, 2023 at 11:18 PM (GMT+3)
Funny event
Boarding flight in Jordan, as guy scans everyone’s tickets and sees passport he’s reading out their names: “maria, have a good flight”, “Abdullah, enjoy your flight” and he’s pronouncing the craziest Arab names possible. Then as he reads my passport there’s a slight pause, then he looks me in the eye and says “have a nice flight”. L name
End of January 2023
    16

 February 2023
Monday, February 13, 2023 at 12:51 AM (GMT+3)
Not sure how to start this like always just kinda need to release all my thoughts right now cause I’m feeling quite overwhelmed with emotions and don’t know what to do. I’m kissed at julie and I don’t know what to do
I think deep down the main reason why I’m feeling this way is cause we fucked on the first night and it was a shit experience and now it’s like a weird fucking friend zone situation. This kind of shit pisses me off. Added to the fact that she’s always subtly saying I’m an asshole and that I don’t appreciate things. Fuck this she doesn’t understand how much fucking money and effort I put into this and she doesn’t even say thank you once. Like I’m sorry but I thiink I reached a point now where yeah initially I wanted to bring her here cause like she’s fun and we would get to smash and it would be cool, but this isn’t how I want shit to be. I’m going to bed pissed off after buying her dinner which she didn’t thank me for in a fancy as fuck hotel she didn’t even once mention some shit like “I’m so happy to be here”. I’m the unappreciated one? Fuck that, I’m going to start treating her the same way I treeated when I was with Omar. This is my trip that I brought her with me, I’m not the bitch that gets bitched around as she picks the sides of the bed and turns off the ac like what the fuck what is the audacity for that. I understand that I’m a playful guy and I enjoy when a girl defies my dominance but fuck there’s a limit. Like please for once just treat me like a friend, I feel so used and so annoyed. Honestly tomorrow I’m going to wake up early hit the gym eat breakfast alone and go work. I can’t be asked to be dealing with this shit. Moments and feelings like this is when I remember the bad parts of being in a relationship
I think I’m going to have to tell her this and be honest with her, cause I don’t think I can last 5 more days bottling up these emotions. Fuck me I haven’t written something as pissed as this in a long time. I know im going to be alright
I think deep down the issue stems from the fact I want to fuck her again but I don’t want to fuck her. I don’t know if I find her attractive or not and the more she does shit like this the more it just fucks with my head.
Alright im going to stop now cause im getting even more annoyed and I need to go to bed.
Feels a little good to be able to write this
Friday, February 17, 2023 at 9:24 PM (GMT+4)
On the plane right now coming from dubai. I fucked up when buying the flights and I bought the flights from Vienna to Paris for Juli for March instead of fucking February... had to spend another 190 on her. I get bursts of frustration for that, mainly at my self because it was 100% my fault, but also at the fact that I don’t want to be paying for her. I kinda got what I wanted from her, as much of a dick as that sounds. I know it’s my commitment to get her back obviously but idk I litteraly see it as money in the trash because I’m not getting anything by paying her that.
I guess now that we’re coming back and I kind of tested this pilot program of bringing girls with me on a trip I can conclude a couple of things.
The main thing is that it works and I think I’m going to start doing it, even though the flights are annoying, if I look at it in the greater sense, it’s all I’m really paying FOR them. The rest is experiences that enhance it for me as well. I don’t mind it too much. However, just as with Omar and with Julie, 7-8 days is too much to have them all day besides you. I think 4-5 days is perfect. After that I get tired and bored of them. With Omar it was chill cause he’s a guy and naturally funny so I could just not give a fuck and shit, but with Julie especially today I was so sick of her. It started in the night we went out yesterday with Silvia and Emmett in dubai, which was amazing I’m so happy to see them and I really look forward to coming back to dubai so I can hang out with them. But Julie just didn’t quite fit in in the club, she’s just not the same type of person as my friends. Idk she had a bit of BO, wearing flip flops (not necessary her fault and she was embarrassed by it as well) but in general she didn’t look nice. And i think it kind of embarrassed me by association. I was having so much fun with them and Julie just wasn’t fully fitting in and was like let’s go dance but I didn’t want to be alone with her when I could be with these friends that I was so much happier with. But I couldn’t be a dick. It pissed me off. I would have stayed longer with them in the club, done more fun stuff and overall would have had a better time. And I think from that period I really became sick of her. We were drunk as fuck on coming back and went to Wendy’s before the hotel to get some food. Then I really just wanted to pass out but she wanted to fuck. I didn’t want to, deep down I was annoyed at her and dont find her physically attractive and having seen Silvia there I really just wanted to fuck her instead. I think I realized then that there’s nothing wrong with wanting a girl that is physically atttraxtive to my standards. But either ways she got me to fuck and it was fine but idk the whole time I just tried not to focus on the fact it was her and much more just trying to feel good. Albeit the experience with Julie was bittersweet in the sense that i wish I would have invited a hotter girl, I do think I learned some incredibly important things. I stopped being so insecure about sex and my body infront of women. I stopped giving a shit and pressuring myself, I stopped being worried about not getting hard. Now I’m just worried cause I cum way too quick and it’s embarrassing. My round 2 game is way better I need to jerk off before fucking cause it’s hella bad I last like 5-10 min
I also regained a lot of my abilities that I used to have with being friends with girls and how to chill with them that I think turkey fucked me with. Most importantly though, which I don’t think I’ve fully learned but I realized with her how important it is just to simply ASK for what you want. You want to fuck
      17

 her? Literally say it. It’s so difficult at first but since they like me and are attracted that’s all it takes. I think I underestimate how much power there is in simply asking for what I want, especially when it comes to girls.
I’m happy with the way things turned out, I’m pissed about the amount of money I fucking spent on deposits for cars that I’m going to have to stress over for the next month to make sure I get them Back, and the fucking flight that I just wasted on this girl I have no desire in fucking.
I’m really excited for tomorrow and being back in london I really miss the guys in the flat and I’m so hyped for tomorrow night going to fabric. These 19 days of detox really have gotten me to appreciate tomorrows event and cherish being back home with the friends I like
Thursday, February 23, 2023 at 12:25 PM (GMT)
Funny thing: in library working and listening to techno set, suddenly I’m like wtf this new track is so offbeat, just to realize a minute later it’s the fire alarm and everyone around me has left the building
End of February 2023
      18

 March 2023
Wednesday, March 22, 2023 at 10:55 PM (GMT)
Haven’t written in a long time and I honestly don’t want to write right now but I feel like a lot of stuff has happened and I want to keep it somewhere before I forget it. Last time I wrote I was in the trip with Julie and I was pissed cause I wasn’t smashing. Everyday after I wrote that we smashed and on the last night I was so sick of her I wanted to chill with Silvia and her friends in the club in dubai but Julie wasn’t fitting in and was all over me while I was so not into her then... so ugh when I think of it.
Moving on, the day I arrived we were to go to fabric, in the morning Linda texts me saying her friend Sasha wants to go as wel and wants to roll. Holy fuck. What a change in my life. One of the most beautiful girls I have ever seen, me and her go off to the best start ever. Her first time rolling and we just had the best chemistry ever. She was with her bf but everytime he went away me and her were all over each other. When I went away to get a drink and came back after a while she was like where did Joao go and when she saw me she was sooo excited and grabbed me and hugged me. There’s a beautiful and wholesome video of the last song they played before fabric closed at 7. One of the nicest memories I had. This last weekend we went out again, this time to e1. Music was better and her bf didn’t go, but he had bought her a chennel purse that day (linda said it costs 3.5k) so even though the chemistry was all there we didn’t make out or anything. I was on some crazy rizz shit. Me and her were dancing so close to each other for so much of the night and I tell her how horny I am and she’s like omg me too, then I’m like we can’t kiss tho, and she’s like you’re right, but then after a while I was trying to make moves but she wasn’t fully reciprocating. A really good one I did was I told her to flex her abs so I could feel it, then I touched it and was like nice. Then I was like feel mine and she just rubs both of her hands all the way down by chest to my abs. That night I wish I would have pulled her. She left a bit earlier than the rest of us (I think because her bf wasn’t there she might have felt a little bit guilty or that she couldn’t fully be comfortable) but as she was talking about leaving, she asks me if I can wait with her outside while she waits for the taxi and coat. Obviously I think that was her way to isolate me so we could kiss, but then as soon as she hugged everyone goodbye and I was like ok I’ll go with her outside to wait with her, linda was like oh okay I’ll also go and so everyone went... I was so pissed but at the same time there’s nothing I could say I think.
That same night I used the horny line on Laura and she was all over me. I told her pulling hair felt really nice and when I did it she got so horny, even asked me to do it again in secret while we were dancing with the rest. As we came home from the club at 6, the joint I hid outside the club got completely wet cause it rained and I’m a retard and didn’t put it in a plastic bag.... So this beautiful walk to Linda’s place along the river we had a wet j that me and dado couldn’t smoke. We got to their place and I hit the phono and literally became retarded. I laid on the couch and I couldn’t even formulate sentences. So fucked. Laura, who was rolling for the first time, was on some revelation energy and wouldn’t stop speaking, to the point where she said outloud that she thinks she’s inlove with me and asked me how I felt about her. I was literally half passed out and this chick is telling everyone In the room (that knows she has a boyfriend for 5 years) that she doesn’t like her boyfriend and wants me. I told her it was unfair to ask me a question like that while I’m in that state of mind. But I really am not attracted to her other than sometimes I wouldn’t mind smashing. I’d much much much rather fuck sasha or linda k or viki.
Speaking of viki, she was meant to come last weekend and roll with us for the first time but she got food poisoning ffs.., I really am curious how the night would have turned out. I really would have tried to kiss her. She’s also really beautiful but her personality is really what makes her so attractive. I should be seeing her tomorrow and this weekend cause she has some friend over and asked dado to ask me if I could take them out somewhere fun. The first time I met her I really made such a good impression, she’s dating Peter’s cousin but I think they’re about to break up, and within like 5 hours of meeting her and 2 bottles of Prosecco and a joint me and her were laying side by side semi cuddling playing battleship against linda and Laura. That was super wholesome and they said she really really liked it (and I’m guessing and hoping me too).
Overall, I’m really happy with the way things are going at the moment and I’m writing this just to kind of keep this in text that I’m having a good time. I think the whole experience with Julie made me a lot more confident with being more ballsy with these girls. I’m not so scared of sex with these new girls, or at least I don’t feel like it.
The nicest thing I heard was during the after party at Laura’s where she confessed her love for me, they were talking about me while I was semi passed out and saying how I’m the only person they know when they bring someone new they can guarantee that other person will like and have fun with. I really like that perception of me and I really hope I keep up with that.
And with that I say goodnight..
End of March 2023
    19

 April 2023
Wednesday, April 12, 2023 at 10:53 PM (GMT+1)
Hello
I’m in Portugal right now, been here for almost 10 days and flying away in 2 days to Brazil for 10 more days with my brothers to be with my dad. Right now im feeling really tired and for some reason not too happy. I was offered a full time role at lanterna moving to Stockholm but the salary was incredibly low considering the tax and the fact that they would only pay my rent for 3 months, so we were not able to come to an agreement. Now it seems I’m gonna have a part time role - which on one hand seems better because I’ll earn more per hour, it is flexible, and I think I can earn commission, but I built up an expectation that I would be moving to Stockholm and I told people about it, and I even found someone else to move into the flat for me, so now that I’m not going in the end I feel a little bit weird- kinda like that kid that brags about how they’re gonna get a car and they end up never getting it. Shitty example but it’s basically boy cried wolf in a way, and I don’t like it. It also leaves me with a weird situation in terms of living. On one hand I’m happy to be leaving the flat - don’t get me wrong I love the guys and I’m really happy I moved in but recently I’ve started to feel like I’m growing past them. Like I feel like my expectations and ways of moving forward with life are a lot different from theirs and it starts to feel like they’re not on my level. Like I don’t know how to put it and I don’t mean like they’re inferior to me because they’re incredibly smart people, but I feel deep down that they’re not on the same level as me in terms of meeting new people and kinda becoming a more interesting person. They’re almost like a smart kids in the class that are chill and all but don’t get bitches. Granted I don’t get as much bitches as I would like either but I feel like I’m getting better, whereas they give up. I get it though, different priorities and all that stuff but I think it’s at this point where I think I’ve gained the most from the experience living with these guys and it’s time to move forward. I want to move on because there’s more I want to talk about but I want to just quickly say how interesting my relationships with the guys individually changed throughout the year. I started out by thinking i would dislike wedde the most and being really impressed by Jonas and obviously matheus was someone I already knew. But now, at the end of the year, although I’d say matheus is still the one that knows the most about me, I think I enjoy spending the most time at home with wedde, he’s a lot like me and I think the main reason why I think I resonate with him the most is because he’s trying to improve himself. We’re really comfortable just chilling and have a really good banter. I think both Jonas and matheus on the other hand think that they’re a lot smarter than me and it reflects a little on our interactions, particularly when it comes to more academic topics or more serious things. It’s the downfall of thinking your so smart than you can’t be open to other people’s perspectives. Matheus especially I think fell the most recently in terms of my perception. I think he’s a smart guy but that’s all he has going for him and that’s the problem. When I bring him out with my friends he isn’t the social butterfly I want to bring with me, like ioannis or Michal or even David - people that I know will leave a good inpression when I bring them with me. Jonas is also just a little bit socially awkward around new people especially girls which again is something I feel that drags me down. That being said so is Pedro and both these guys have the benefits that they’re attractive dudes so it kind of compensates. Wedde isn’t shy or awkward but I think his problem is that he just lacks the experience to have good rizz and the self awareness in those moments to know how other people are perceiving him, again though, I think that’s the easiest thing to fix.
Anyways, moving on I just kind of want to look ahead into what the near future looks like, I have to move out by the 1st of June, which means I have a couple of options. The first is to stay with my brother in Fulham. Not a horrible option but definitely not the ideal. The second option is to maybe look into staying with Linda because I think Laura will be gone by then. I think I’d like this the most and I would pay her and Laura a bit to stay there so I wouldn’t feel bad. The only problem here is that over the last couple of weeks I’ve had this enfatuatjon for Linda for some reason, and I realllly want to smash. I know I can do it I think but she has a boyfriend, and though that would usually not stop me, I like her too much as a friend to destroy her relationship like that because I really know that would. Nonetheless I know myself that when I want something I will try to get it regardless of what I think is right or wrong. We’ll see, I don’t know what it is but the time we made edibles and I arrived just before she was leaving for squash and had her sports bra on holy fuck I was so locked in. Laura has a problem with me which makes me not want her anymore, how attached and everything that she is, and I think that also fucks up my angle towards sasha because I think they speak about these things. I really wanna fuck sasha but I think I’m slowly falling into the friend zone - I’m not fully sure but I think she’s hot enough to have done this to guys and she’s not really leading me on because we’ve never said anything sexual through message to each other, although in person last time it got quite intense but nothing ever happened. I need to play it smart here and pull a couple of bluffs to get her to want me. This is exactly like Silvia or Linda k, I have to reveal my cards and tell her I’m sorry no more of this etc and in their sadness of seeing me not want to be with them anymore they start thinking about hooking up and that’s when it happens. The problem with Sasha is that having her around is pretty cool, she’s chill and hot asf so it raises me in the club environment. I think I need to see her outside a club environment so I can figure out where I stand. Viki has been a tremendous development since last time, I don’t know what exactly i did but now she’s hooked, and I think I can hook up with her. We text a bit and i can tell she’s putting effort as well, we’re planning on seeing each other in Portugal over the summer. She’s cool, I think she’s cute and gf material but I don’t see us realistically doing much more than just hooking up. I think she sees me as an escape from her otherwise kinda boring relationship and life, and that’s why we’re vibing. Though she and I have a lot in common and I really do think she is gf material. Maybe in the future who knows.
Oh well I don’t know what more to say, I feel like I’m lost right now because I don’t know where I’ll be and what I’ll be doing in 2 months from now - I might ask Daniel if I can work part time but from Stockholm, and maybe receive some sort of subsidy on my stay while I’m there. Or I could just straight
  20

 up travel somewhere and work from there until end of uni. The problem is that there’s not many people that I think I’m close enough with to let me stay at their place for so long without it being awkward to ask, there’s Mohamed, Viki, maybe Barbier, but all these guys either live far so I wouldn’t be able to go back and forth to london for the fyp shit, or they’re in boring locations that I don’t want to be in, like Bratislava. I wish I knew someone in Barcelona that I’m chill with and could just stay. Prague would be a shout if Viki is there, I could also ask to rent out his place and be with my friends there. It would also allow me to meet with sofie which I think I also have the opportunity to get with her, though I don’t know whether when I see her in real life I would be attracted, idk I think I will...
We’ll see, again, I’m excited how my life is moving at the moment. These feelings of worry or sadness I think are a positive product of the development of my character and overall life. I’m really really curious what my life will be like in a year from now. I’m gonna guess I’ll be in Australia - maybe not Melbourne but somewhere there. Aight peace out
End of April 2023
  21

 June 2023
Monday, June 5, 2023 at 1:38 AM (GMT+1)
Alright I don’t know how to start this but Im kinda forcing myself to write one of these because the last few days have been crazy. I moved into Linda’s place last Thursday, the same day we both go to a bar with Pedro and Caio, which was so good what a way to start off our living experience of being together. Then on Saturday when I wake up she tells me that sasha had texted her if she wanted to go with her and neel and I guess sasha knew that I was living here so they invited me as well. We went to the lunch at this market place in Mayfair it was crazy, such a good fucking time. Me and Linda were vibing, me and Sasha were next to each other the whole time and I could sense that she was so happy I was there. I went there with a kinda open mind about neel because the only other time I saw him he was a bit shy, but he won me over in that lunch, after seeing his house just before and seeing how me and him were able to banter was crazy. Then as the girls are going to buy ice creams they come back and say hey we had a thought in the queue that we should go raving today. Then we were all like yeah why not, the girls especially Sasha wanted to do MD so hard. So we all decided to go to fabric. I told Beau and Jonas also to come since it was beaus second night in london. The night was meant to be staying in fabric until 3 and then going to Maddox. Pedro and Caio were going to Maddox the same day so I was like yeah that’s gonna be sick I’ll have my friends there too. The night couldn’t have gone better. I met neels cool ass friend Nythia and from the moment we started speaking it clicked. We had crazy chemistry and we’re playing with each other for a long time. We then start dancing together and flirting until she says “alight one kiss” and we pop kissed, then I say that only counts as half a kiss we have to do it again. Then after a couple of seconds she throws her face at me and we make out for like 10 seconds, infront of linda sasha and the others. It was so ducking good cause I was rolling so hard, the vibes were immaculate and the crowd and people that came with us were just working out so we’ll. After that point she kinda started distancing herself from me, we were in the cab to Maddox and I’m sitting next to her and I start asking her questions about herself. She was crazy gf material. That night she wasn’t even on MD cause she had rolled the week before she was on coke instead. Super cool person to go clubbing, and so I told her I need to get your Instagram cause you seem like the perfect person to go clubbing with. We then go to Maddox where it was ducking chill as hell. The music was banging. It was like old and popular house songs but adapted to be more house-y and shit it was crazy u could sing along to the house songs. Throughout the whole time btw I’m the clubs me and Sasha kept on dancing with each other. The amount of times we danced closely together and audaciously flirt. There was a point where I asked where her perfume is from, and she was like, you like it huh? And I was like of course and then she says you remember last time? Which was when in e1 I kissed her neck for quite a while and we were almost able to make out but she didn’t want to because Linda and Laura were there and could see us. We start dancing even more intimitsly almost about to kiss and she’s like we can’t do it this time neels here. And I played an ice game and was like yeah that can’t happen again. From that point the amount of times she would come up and discretely rub my chest or grab me or even tell me she wanted to fuck me was crazy. I felt amazing. We go to neels house for the after party. It’s me Caio Pedro and Linda, and some people from Maddox that I guess knew neel. Neel was a chill ass fucking dude his apartment is massive with 2 living rooms and 4 bedrooms, and he had literally everything and he was telling people just grab what u want. I wanted weed a lot and Sasha knew it so she asked if neel could roll us a J which I’d expect him to be a little resistive or annoyed at but he just brought a pack full of weed and rolled us a joint. It was crazy. In the morning when I went to Sasha’s and neels house before lunch she was watching shark tales and me and her started to bond over the movie so when we started smoking I turn to her and say “smoke and then shark tales?” And her face lightens up and she gets super happy and is like yesssss and then we all smoke for a bit until she’s like alright let’s go watch and I move to the couch with her along with Laura and Pedro and Caio, I was in between sasha and Caio. That was so fucking chill the vibes were actually crazy. The other dudes that fhe afters were playing funk music and we were chilling here laughing and watching shark tales. I’m having conversations with Caio and then sasha just starts asking me stuff to get me to talk to her, at that point is roughly when we started talking about sex and she was like would you want to have sex with me. And I replied no of course as an obvious tease and it worked so well she was like ahh why not and i started making some shit up and that’s when I realized how much this girl is into me. She started telling me how she’s moving to london next year and if I’m going to be here and I was like no I’ll be in Melbourne and she got so sad she was like nooo you have to stay... will you come visit? And I was like it’s halfway across the world... this might be the last time we see each other. Shes like don’t say that! First of all I’m coming back in two weeks so we’re going to see each other then and second of all you’re going to visit. I told her that I’m going to be in Bratislava next Saturday and if she was going to be there, to which she was like yes!! You should come watch me horseride. I would actually be 100% down I’d love to see that shit. I told her yeah if it’s in the afternoon I would actually go watch and I told her to tell me the schedule for the races. She seemed hyped af that I was going there. It was really nice the vibes and it was so perfect. After some point I heard one of the chicks speak portugues and I was like se e brasileira? And then she’s like you’re Brazilian? And I’m like nah I’m Portuguese but those two are and I point to Pedro and Caio. This girl is gorgeous she looked like an actual prostitute, she must’ve been at most 23. She sees caio and she’s like vem pra ca gatinho while pointing to caio. He instinctively gets up and we all start talking. Pedro joins and now the whole afters is talking to each other. This girl was crazy. She is British but went to Bahia in 2021 and started dating a bandido. She was intimidating af. She caught me off guard a couple of times because her Portuguese was so gangster and full of slang. She was chill nonetheless. Eventually everyone leaves apart from this Brazilian gangster girl and us 4, so we decide to go home as well. Perfect night, we get into the same Uber with Caio and Pedro and added a stop and our house on the way to Pedro’s house. We get to around monument and it’s by now maybe 7 am, no one is on the streets and I’m fucking retarded rn. I’m forgetful I’m tweaking off of Md and a line or Coke and I just need to go see the view of the city from the river. We walk there, totally empty and we just stay there for about 10 minutes just staring at the city and talking. It was fucking sick. We go back inside and I fhen load up some random shit on YouTube, I think a David attenbourlh movie and we just talk and talk. We’re both still tweaking and I’m also high as shit. We stayed up till 9:30 when Linda decides to go to bed and I’m like cool I’ll stay here till this episode ends. I was then too energetic still I considered going on a walk but there would be too many people now. I decided to go back to my room, open the window and smoke a j while listenting to a be svensen set. Fucking beautiful at that point I had already taken melatonin like 2 hours ago and nytol like 15 minutes befroe smoking. They both started kicking in and I became ultra retarded. I then got to the bed and just died. I woke up again at 7.00 pm while linda was vacuuming. I then text Pedro, me and Linda talk for a long time again and then I end up going to see Caio and Pedro to smoke one. We smoked it was chill af we laughed and watched f9 which was hilarious how fucking unreal that movie is. I then walked home, beautiful walk with no headphones of course and now we’re here. Long piece of text but this was one of the best and craziest 3 days of my life. I felt like a fucking Boss getting shit from 2 girls and living with another one. I felt crazy. Next Friday I’m going with lucka to a polo event with open bar so we’re gonna get shitfaced and watch mfs on horses. So excited. Then I’m going to prague on Saturday and am gonna be there for a week. Also super excited about that. Life is going very week right now I feel amazing. Hopefully I can look back at this entry and get reminded of how sick your life is
    22

   Tuesday, June 27, 2023 at 9:09 PM (GMT+1)
Hello
Right now I’m sitting by vauxhall bridge by the river after going on a walk from monument, where I’m staying right now with Linda, to Pimlico to see the place from last year. There’s quite a lot of stuff I want to talk about cause these last few weeks have been hella eventful. To start off I’m almost about to end university, just 2 more days till I have my last presentation for the final year project and I’ll be done... super excited to finish and go to Australia but at the same time I’m getting some of the sadness from leaving the city behind, especially knowing I won’t see a lot of the friends that I’ve been with this year. I’m starting to get this now, telling people I won’t be able to make plans next week because I’m flying away, but then I also think about how I have no idea how long until I’ll see them again. First was Pedro, that felt kinda weird because I saw him when I was like 11 and then didn’t see him till I was 19 and now I’m leaving and don’t know when I’ll see him again. It’s crazy how life just moves on and one day to the next you don’t know who you’ll never see again...or at least with the lifestyle that i have. Sasha’s also coming the day after I leave, which I won’t be able to see her and problably won’t ever get to smash. She’s moving to london and was super excited hoping I would be here but now it’s like nope won’t be here. Sad but fuck it tho I really started to like neel I don’t think I would have been able to have her cheat on him with me.
Other news, I came back yesterday from a 4 day trip with Linda to Cyprus. It was basically my “rent” for living at her place rent free. The trip was amazing. I didn’t get tired of her, which is suprising from the trip that I had with julie. As a sidenote just before going to Cyprus I was in prague for a week with viktor holy shit that was amazing. I’m looking back now and I had so much fucking fun. We spent literally the entire week together and I didn’t once get bored of talking to him or think we were doing something boring. The week flew past. I met with Natalie twice, which she got braces after getting her jaw fixed . It looked hella weird but I think when she gets them off she’ll be much prettier than she was before. She’s also thinking of going to visit me in Australia, I’d fuck with it she’s chill asf and I like spending time with her, I don’t get bored either. I also met sofie and we went out until like 2 am talking and drinking. It was really fun, she’s cool and I liked being with her, but she talks quite a lot and her face is meh.. but her body is pretty cool. Anyways prague was amazing im excited to plan another trip with viktor this summer cause if it’s with Silvia and other people as well it would be amazing.,
Back to Cyprus. The day of the flight linda came home from michals house at 7 am... she had work at 8. She basically fucked him and that basically was her confirming to herself she was going to break up with her bf. I felt a bit weird cause I Lowkey felt like if she was Down to fuck why wasn’t I able to lay her? At the same time i knew if she fucked him she would probably be down to fuck me as well, especially on a trip...and I was right. Kinda fucked cause she still hadn’t broke up after we fucked like 3 times, once in the morning as soon as we woke up. It was a front view of the entire sea in larnaca. The room was full of mirrors infront and behind so I just remember the blinds being up I’m staring at the sea to the left and infront of me and in front it’s the reflection of linda giving me head while completely naked. I felt great even tho the head was kinda mid. The trip otherwise was super fun. We went to the beach twice, the first time was sick it was on the first day we were there, we just laid there the whole day then went to eat a massive baller tray of sushi by this restaurant on the beach it was so amazing. That day was when I was laying all my rizz on her, we then went on a hike to get some sand, drinking the entire time holy fuck I drank so much that day. Cyprus is really great - Aiya Napa especially. Then we went on a hike the next day, and I decided to take an edible and let Linda drive back. Totally great idea, had a beautiful time. That day feels like a dream in retrospect.
Now that I’m back I’m feeling a little bit weird, maybe it’s cause I’ve had such good 2 last weeks and now I’m getting a little bit of post depression, the same way like Md. The reason why I’m on this walk is cause I was getting stressed from my presentation and Linda went out on another date with Michal. I guess I’m also a little bit jealous that she wants to fuck him while last night we didn’t. I like the arrangement we have I think if Laura’s not home (she arrives tomorrow) and if we’re a little tipsy it’s definitely down, which is the exact same arrangement with Laura...lmao. Looking back at these things I’m gonna be like wtf but in the moment it feels so cool. I definitely know this isn’t good for me.
Anyways, now I’m looking forward to seeing lucka and her friends in Portugal, even though it probably will only be for 1 or 2 days. I need to plan some more of these trips because I’m having such a blast in all of them.
Don’t know how to finish this I think there’s something else I wanted to write about but I can’t seem to remember. Anyways fuck it see u next time
23

    Thursday, June 29, 2023 at 12:38 AM (GMT+1)
Hello
I know I wrote yesterday but for some reason right now I’m laying in bed and was reading and i felt like my brain was too active and didn’t know what to do. Anyways, nothing really eventful happened since last night, I started and finished my poster for tomorrow lol, fuck the demo it’s such a useless part I already know I passed and the grade means nothing to me. Though in the process of making the poster it’s funny how I become such a perfectionist despite knowing in the back of my mind I don’t need to try that hard. Oh well, it’s done. Pretty happy I just hope tomorrow nothing glitches or gets fucked.
Today Laura arrived, like an hour and half ago. She gained weight around the ass and looks worse than I remembered her. Thats a bummer now I have no desire to smash at all. Linda on the other hand is kinda making me want her, she left the house yesterday at 8 to go out and came back at 11 pm today... spent the whole day and night and following day and night with him. I’m happy for her she seems like she’s genuinely having a good time. But for some reason I have this weird feeling that I don’t like her doing stuff like this. I’m not sure whether it’s some sort of jealousy that I want her to get with me and not him, idk. But I don’t actually find her super hot, even though she has a really good body. Idk what it is, it could also be the fact that
  25

 she seems a little bit crazy doing these things, like she’s doing all these crazy nights with this guy as a way to forget the fact that she literally finished a 2 year relationship. She seems a little bit lost but in my opinion I think she’s going to get with this guy. Means I probably won’t get to fuck her again, unless we do something on the weekend. But that wouldn’t be possible if both of them are home... they’re literally sleeping in the same bed. I don’t even know if she’d be down, now that she has this guy she keeps talking about is perfect. Anyways that’s nothing too important.
I sent a message today to the Nitya girl that I met at fabric through neel like 3 weeks ago or something. She didn’t even open the message. Really fucking weird she’s ghosting me like a mf I don’t know what I did. I’m probably just gonna send her another message in like a day or two if she doesn’t reply just saying like “I guess you’re too cool for me” just so I get the last word. I think that’s also a big reason why I’m kinda feeling weird rn, seeing linda have such a blast with this dude after they’ve gone out literally like 3 times, and then I’m like fuck where’s my girl like that. I think it’s a good thing to be pushed like this cause I’m more getting pushed to go out. Tomorrow I’m going to Richmond to smoke up with Iman. I don’t think she’s hot at all but she was good company and I think now that we’ve already met once it’s gonna be even better convos. I kinda want linda and Laura to know I’m on a date, just so they feel a little jealous as well, it’s probably gonna keep them on their toes. Idk what to think about it.
I feel like I’m on a constant “idk” feeling. I don’t know what I want or don’t want or any of that shit. I think that’s a big reason why I feel so weird rn. It’s that I have no plan for anything right now. I don’t know if I want to get a gf (I don’t think it makes sense if I’m leaving to Australia, and I also don’t know a single girl I’d want to get into a relationship). Also, spending those 4 days with Linda and getting to smash made me kinda not want a relationship that much anymore. It made me think I won’t ever want to have a relationship. Like there’s something about having the responsibility of someone else and like after we smash I don’t really feel great or happy - like obviously I feel good cause I came and I feel powerful, but I don’t feel comfortable. It makes we wonder whether it’s the girl that I just haven’t found or whether it’s me that has a problem. I think it’s probably the girl cause getting with Linda was a lot better than Laura or Juli for example.
I think also deep down I have a deep sense of insecurity for these types of things, the fact that I’m subconsciously jealous about linda hooking up with the guy even tho all we did was casual sex makes me wonder how worse would I be if I was actually in a relationship? Like I think I would be too jealous with annoying shit. And the problem is that I know rationally it’s dumb as fuck to be jealous and it’s coming from insecurities but it doesn’t help the shitty feeling that comes with being jealous.
I think what I need is to meet different types of girls. I know that it’s become really nice and kinda easy to get with these Slavic girls and I feel like with enough time I can get with any of them, i think they’re bad for my perception of women. I think going to Australia might help me discover different types of women that I will want to spend time with beyond just to relieve my horniness. I don’t know what I’ll be doing until I go there. I’m a little bit worried about the summer months and not being able to get a girl. I’ll be in Portugal and I know that there’s girls there that I would want to meet but I feel like in cadafais u end up just staying there the entire time because it’s so annoying and inconvenient to travel to the center. So unless I know someone (which I don’t) to go see it’s like why the fuck would u travel there for no reason. I want to get a job as well but I don’t want to be tied down to a shitty schedule. I want to find a job that I can meet people but also be able to just stop and go somewhere else whenever I want. Maybe the bar in Cascais I used to go with Bernardo. I think I could get a job there and I would be able to meet people. But at the same time it’s a little small and not many people work there. But fuck that’s the thing I can’t be thinking about all the minute shitty details. I know if I worked there something new would happen I would experience some shit I wasn’t expecting.
I could also do a summer course in one of the universities, that would allow me to meet people and have the flexibility of not having a job. I’m actually gonna do some research on that rn. Fuck it I’ve been writing for too long anyways this was kind of a shitty diary. Will be cool to look back after the summer when whatever happens happened.
Adios
End of June 2023
  26

 July 2023
Saturday, July 1, 2023 at 3:12 PM (GMT+1)
Yo quick message
Just packed my bags to fly away from London tomorrow. Feel a little sad. About to go to the cinema with lucka and Greta in just a bit.
Wanted to write this because the day Laura arrived we smashed and she went to bed (she was sleeping with Linda) at like 5 AM so Linda woke up and I don’t think she’s dumb so she knows what’s up. That’s not the problem. The problem is last night we were drinking and I started playing some oldies classics and we started singing and me and Linda were all over each other but since Laura was there the whole time we couldn’t do anything but we were like by each other and as the night went on we started just singing and dancing together. Then I think it got a little bit too much for Laura cause she got pissed for some fucking reason and she was like “ok that’s enough for me I’m leaving” and got up and left. She, a girl in a fucking relationship, was jealous that me and Linda were vibing like crazy. I’m so fucking pissed off that cockblock bitch, it was such beautiful energy from us together and Laura had to fuck it up by just being boring. I’m so pissed cause I want to fuck linda before I leave tomorrow but that runt bitch is always around and just doesn’t leave my sight. I wish she went out with her friends yesterday and me and Linda would have been left alone. Idk how it’s gonna go tonight, I hope Laura got the clue that me and Linda want each other and won’t be a cockblock like last night cause I was soooo fucking pissed. I went to bed drunk as fuck and horny and I know that Linda was the exact same in the other room. Fml I need to be creative tonight to get it working
Tuesday, July 18, 2023 at 11:58 PM (GMT+2)
Hello
Right now I’m in pevy in France outside sitting and staring at the stars. I don’t know how long it’s been since I’ve been able to look at the sky at night and see stars. A lot has happened over the last 2 weeks. I’m spending this week with Victor and his family in his farm. I’ve been here for 2 days now, this is my second night. It’s very nice, I like the change of scene and it’s relaxed here I don’t do shit the whole day but travel around and play tennis. About a week ago Viki horvathova posted a post where she looked hot asf so I hit her up saying “nice dress, when are you coming to portugal” literally with no expectations on her response. To my surprise she was SUPER down, she was like when can I come and. I gave her the dates that worked for me and then within 4 days she had booked her flights to stay with me for 10 days. She’s bringing along a friend called biba, she looks pretty fun, she has big boobs and looks like a hoe a bit but that’s definitely what will make it more exciting. 10 days is quite a while. On one hand I’m happy because I’ll spend quite a lot of time with them, but on the other hand I’m worried I’m gonna get sick of them or they’re gonna get bored. Fuck it I’m guessing, I’m gonna do my best so that I have fun, and in that process I’m guessing they’re gonna have fun. A big problem is that I know that Viki is down to smash. Well I don’t know for sure but me and her have chemistry and I know I can “rizz” her up enough, but everywhere we go, except for the weekend we’ll spend in Carregado, idk how we’ll be able to smash. If she comes sleep in my room it’s gonna be hella obvious for biba and idk if she’s on the vibe cause most girls are worried about being judged like that. But then again I don’t know what their relationship is like and idk if it can be open enough so that everyone knows we’re smashing. Another thing is that biba also looks like she could get it. She looks fun and slutty and thats a recipe for a good time. I don’t know if I’ll be able to do both of them with both of them knowing, and idk how I can smash either of them without the other one finding out. We’ll see. I’m gonna be spending 2 nights with my dad and his gf Cynthia in Algarve. Idk how that’s gonna be as well. I’m worried it’s gonna be a bit weird at night especially cause we won’t be able to make much noise, but then again there’s the room in the top, which is where if I were to smash it would have to be there cause the other room is too close to them. Again, I feel like we’ll see how it works out. I hope they don’t have their expectations super high because I’m Lowkey not providing that much of an entertainment myself, I’m hoping they will be fun enough to help make the life of the party.
In other topics, right now I’m in the toilet taking a shit and Vincent just told me Victor and Jakub killed 3 something (he said the name in French but tf do I know what it means). And they’re arriving any moment now. I’ll wait for them and see lol. I spent the night with Elise and her new guy. Elise has very weird energy around me. I feel like in a different universe me and her would have definitely smashed. All her bfs look like me, and we tease each other very sexually. When her bf is out the room she randomly shakes her ass sometimes and we have very intimate conversations. I just don’t know how I would be able to transition the mood, especially cause she doesn’t drink so the drunk method wouldn’t work. Then again she’s not as hot as she once was. She’s a little too big now, too muscular, for my type. Still think I would definitely hit if the opportunity came about, but I think although it wouldn’t make it weird cause it never becomes weird when I do these things, it could make the relationship with Victor a bit strange if he found out, although I think he wouldn’t. I don’t even think he knows we made out 4 years ago.
Anyways, there’s not much more to say, I did the English exam for Australia on Friday and I got 90/90 which was great. I got a job offer on LinkedIn and I still need to send the guy my CV but that could be a cool thing. I’m just now waiting to get my criminal record from slovakia and I still need to do it for the UK but I think then I can apply to Australia. Then it’s a waiting game... idk what I’m gonna do until then. Maybe I go back to the Uk for a bit...? But I don’t wanna pay rent and I kinda made it such a big thing that i was leaving— well I still am but I said it almost as like I’m never seeing them again. But idk I’ll figure it out, probably whatever I would plan right now would end up happening totally differently so there’s no point. Just have fun
      27

 and things will work their way. Alright that’s all I have to say Peace out
Oooh I just realized I didn’t write anything about my trip to Porto with Lucka. Soo fun. I really had a great time. I fuck with lucka so much. She introduced me to her portuguese friend that she knew from camp. Really pretty and really nice. I hope I get to see her again. We had such a great day all three of us. Definitely hope I see her again. If I go to london luckas definitely a big pull factor.
Monday, July 31, 2023 at 11:07 PM (GMT+1)
Hey
Right now I’m writing this in the living room in cadafais while I kill time until I have to drive biba and Viki to the bus station. The trip is basically over and idk how to feel overall. I’m pissed that I didn’t get anything from it, not even s kiss. I don’t know if she was just very difficult to get and I wasn’t able to get her to become attracted to me. Either ways I’m pissed off. I really thought she had come here with the intentions of wanting to get with me as well. Maybe because biba was here she was a bit scared of doing anything with me in case people would find out, or maybe I just didn’t have enough time to get her to like me. Each progressive day I started to think she was getting more and more into me, yesterday we went to brunch and they got shitfaced while I was rolling with dado and when I saw them they were so happy to see me and so out of their mind drunk. It was cool because me and her were walking together and then we were playing truth or truth in the taxi on the way back. But at the same time I think she might have gotten with another dude. Fuck women holy shit. Like I know that the only person I can blame is myself. I think I’m compensating for my insecurities of intimacy buy paying for their meals and shit like that but that makes me like a peasant in their eyes and I think that deep down that makes it harder for me to get them to get attracted to me. I’m gonna ask for the money for the club tickets back, but everything else I’m gonna leave it as it is because I’m not gonna be petty. I just feel really unfulfilled right now. Like I had a good time I think, but not being able to smash while being with these girls for so long has fucked me up. Like I notice that I feel almost like Ozzy feels when lily is on heat. I don’t eat as much, I feel like I have a sped up heart rate. It’s so fucked and the worst part is that I feel like had I done things slightly different it would have ended differently. Like don’t get me wrong I loved the trip and I could keep going for longer with them, but the lack of sex really messes with me. Maybe if Viki had come alone and it would have just been me and her it would have been different. I think I might have been able to smash. Probably definitely, but it doesn’t change the fact that that’s not the case, and that someway somehow i was not able to get her attracted and comfortable enough to want to even kiss me. I think the root of my feelings right now though are more the fact that I’m a fucking pussy when it comes to acting on my feelings. I didn’t once reveal to Vicki how I felt and that I wanted to get with her. I’ve learned time and time again that the biggest way to get girls to want to smash is to plant the seed in their head that you’re into them. I didn’t do that to Vicki maybe until like the day before yesterday when we were all playing most likely and I had to reveal that out of all the girls I’d want her to piss on me for sexual gratification. Weird but I was so happy in the moment I did that, even though it was slightly awkward. Like I honestly don’t know whether I’m gonna ever tell her how i feel. I’m sure she knows in her mind that I wanted to get with her, it’s the cockiness in women to feel that, but one thing is knowing and another thing would be me straight up proposing it. Even yesterday we were suggesting two different hotel rooms with the guy biba was leading on for free drinks and I don’t know whether the plan would be for me to sleep with Vicki or they slept together and I slept in the other room, because the dude of the hotels I assumed would sleep with biba. But then again I don’t think she would ever want to do that so idk. All I know is that I’m a little disappointed in myself. I keep on thinking that I’m becoming better with getting girls, and I definitely believe I made a lot of improvement but I’m still fundamentally lacking the ability to reveal my feelings. And that really bothers me. I always do this, same with Silvia, same with Linda K the first time, same with Vicki now, I try to make them read my mind that I want them and I think in the process the anger that I get from them not reciprocating makes me bottle up my emotions and then I have to do some salty rant over message to them where I profess my lust for them and hit them with the im not able to talk to you anymore card. I don’t want to do that though, it’s so childish and weak. But I also don’t want to tell it to her face. Idk man, I think I need some serious time to myself to re-evaluate my life right now and what I value in life. I feel so lost and so... I don’t even know what word to say. I feel confused about where my life is going, a little bit out of control. I might be falling into a little bit of a depression right now due to everything — finishing uni and not wanting to work a 9-5, not being satisfied with my relationships with women, wanting to go to a country on the opposite side of the world with the idea of starting basically a new life, but unlike every other move that I’ve done this one would be 100% my responsibility to make it work or not.
I think it’s also the fact that I’ve used these last 10 days as almost like a mental distraction from all my worries and responsibilities. I’m not liking where I’m going in terms of my discipline and my willpower. I think I used to be so much more dedicated and proactive and since uni I’m becoming lazier and lazier. I hate this feeling. I also think that I’m currently being a lot more emotional than I usually am, simply because of the frustration that I have. Just thinking about the girls and how I was sleeping next to them for 10 nights straight and I wasn’t once able to make out with Vicki destroys me. It’s such a pussy thing, such a beta , the type that other people walk over you. I’m being really tough with myself
    28

   End of July 2023
29

 August 2023
Wednesday, August 2, 2023 at 10:57 PM (GMT+1)
Hello
I’m currently laying in bed in Tomas’ room in the top bunk and I know when he comes up he’s gonna be pissed that I’m sleeping on the top bunk. On the last diary 2 nights ago I stopped abruptly because biba came down because she couldn’t sleep and so we watched vampire diaries together. Was pretty nice she was there.
Since they left I’ve been feeling really depressed. I’m not sure if it’s from the MD on Sunday or because I feel like I spent so much money and effort on these girls and I didn’t get to smash, or that I just finished a long holiday and now I’m back to reality and I don’t know what I’m going to be doing with my life over the next months. I want to think it’s the MD. Either ways I know it’s temporary. I’ve got to ride through it. I keep on thinking about Viki. I feel like I’m in love, but I know this definitely isn’t love. I know that there’s certain things about her I wouldn’t be able to stand, but I think the fact that i wasn’t able to get her really makes me want her more. Yesterday I went to sushi with my mom and me and Vicki were texting the whole day, she was super keen and kept on texting back and asking questions. At dinner I was texting but I wasn’t super focused because I couldn’t be on my phone the whole time and so I was slightly teasing everything she was saying and then she said “stop harassing me” and then I replied “sorry, all the sexual frustration is coming out in the form of insults”. She hasn’t sent a message since. I don’t know why the fuck I said that. I guess I have to commit to it now. I definitely do regret saying it and it makes me think that now it’s weird between us, but I also think I’m putting so much more thought into it than I have to. I keep thinking like fuck now I don’t have a chance and she’s not gonna want to text me, but then I think like we’ll now she at least knows a little how I feel about her. But then again it’s not fully obvious, that’s the part that bothers me. It’s like a slight sneak but not full commitment. Honestly I don’t know about that situation, I want to just say fuck it and try to move on but it’s so present on my mind. I’ve been feeling so out of place, I don’t have any motivations, any idea about what I want to do. I think doing more of these trips like this are only going to delay the inevitable... I think all I have to do now is figure out what my plan is for October onwards, then everything else with slightly fall into place. I’m thinking right now maybe to somehow continue doing what I was doing for Lanterna but for my own company. I need to develop it first. I have the tutoring website (for myself) already up and published but I’m yet to send out the mass email to all my leads from Lanterna’s presentation. I need to be very careful and remove any weird looking emails that might be from the company itself. Once I have that done if I get even just like 3-4 students that’s going to be a big source of income to the one that is quickly draining from my bank account. Then with the spare time I have until September/October I want to develop the AÍ tutoring platform, then my goal is to have it published in October. I then want to travel a bit and do some presentations/talks to schools to build more customers and eventually have it fully working.
In terms of living situation idk where I want to be. London would be nice because I have the Slovak friends there + a couple of other people but I think the Slovaks aren’t good for me. Like I love the friends but the girls are bad for me. I have a weird desire to fuck all of them and there’s none that I see a future with. Maybe if I do trips I can find someone that will be down to come along. Like honestly I’m thinking about Vicki when it comes to this. She’s low maintenance when it comes to entertaining and I think she’s pretty flexible with her studies from September. The only thing is I’m kind of sick of paying for these chicks. I don’t have the type of money to do that shit right now. And I think paying for them is creating a weird way of me thinking about them and it’s the whole reason I feel like shit rn in the first place. I think I would really just want a girl that I can travel to all these places with, not a different one each time. Alternatively, if flying around isn’t a big possibility I could also start spending several weeks couch surfing with friends around the world while I wait for my Australia visa... Natalie comes to mind, if she’s going to Miami I would definitely go stay with her for like 2-3 weeks.
I think the future is exciting for me and again I do think shit will work out in one way or another. Tomorrow I have the last stage of my recruitment process for the quantitative finance research associate role. I have to do this presentation about quantitative finance and all that shit. The more I look into it the less interested I am. But I’ve made it this far, and I want to keep my options open — who knows it might lead to some cool things. I was going to finish the last slide or 2 before going to bed but I decided to spend the time instead writing this. It honestly made me feel a lot better. I think this diary writing is becoming a really nice habit that I’m forming. Especially in times like this when I feel unlike myself and have so much on my mind being able to write stuff out and to think more clearly really makes it seem so much better. Anyways not sure when I’ll write again next, because I feel like I only write these when I have lots on my mind or when something big happens but anyways byebye
Saturday, August 5, 2023 at 12:19 AM (GMT+1)
Hello
I’m writing this sitting outside on the door I’m the living room because it’s so warm inside the house with all the blinds closed like the house is a fucking diamond vault. Yesterday I had my interview for the job, it went really well. I honestly don’t know why they liked it so much, I thought I could have done so much better. They gave me a verbal offer on the spot and I told them I’d get back to them with a concrete decision by the end of next week. I still
      30

 haven’t seen the full contract but he said I should expect to make between 60-120k on my first year. I’m still thinking every day if I want to do it or not. I’m torn between taking the job or not. I’ve been telling myself I’m going to make a pros and cons list to put all my ideas on paper. Let’s start with the cons. First of all, London itself. It’s the weather, the cost of living, the price of transport, the strikes all the time. I’m getting anxiety thinking about spending the winter again in that country. It kills me. I can’t with days ending before 5 PM. I also am tired of the people there. I know it’s a massive city and if I think about it each year I’ve been there I’ve become friends with different people, but I really mean the Slovaks. I’m afraid if I go back to london I’ll stay in my comfort zone and hang out with the Slovaks and shit. I like dado lucka and Linda so much, but they’re slovak and I’m not, you know. I’ll never be able to feel at one with them. Their friends are slovak and I can’t be integrated in that group. I think the fact that Bernardo is moving there is amazing, it means that I could potentially hang out with him more often - I could even choose to live with him and Bruna. That would be sick. But I don’t wanna pay 1.2k a month for a flat. Holy shit. But it is a crazy flat... idk I think it’s something I can consider. The other con is that idk if I want to start a full 9-6 job. I’ve gotten so used to the flexibility of just traveling wherever I want for however long I want and that was a great feeling. I’m thinking about how I wanted to go watch slovakia vs Portugal with Linda K in September, and how I wanted to go to Lausanne to see Silvia... I know that the job is hybrid and it is a start up so I’m sure they must be flexible with the work style, especially if I’m getting the results, but right in September is the beginning of the job so I can’t be doing these trips right away. It also won’t allow me to spend so much time pursuing the tutoring venture, which although I think it has so much potential, I’m not putting as much time right now as I should. I think also the fact that Vicki is not going back there to live plays a big role. I think if she was returning I’d almost be fully convinced to be going back, because I would see a path where we would get together. Speaking of which, we texted a lot today. We’re texting on the groupchat with biba, even though it’s straight up just me and her talking. I think the message I sent the other day blew over. It’s good now tho cause she knows how I felt and she’s texting with interest again. She seems quite bored with her life at the moment, which is really great from my perspective I guess because it means that she’s spending a lot of time absorbing the stuff from our trip. I’m really in lust with her rn. She’s always teasing and in a good mood, and she doesn’t get salty or emotionally manipulated easily. That’s another thing, I thought about if I didn’t go to London I could focus on the tutoring platform and eventually do the PR trips for the new company like last year and bring her along. I know she would be down, especially if I pay for everything. I don’t want to be a sugar daddy but I think this is Lowkey the way it is for most dudes at the end of the day. If I think about any guy with a stay at home wife ur just paying for everything. Idk I just want to have enough money coming in that it’s not a huge dent to be covering her flights and eating expenses. But I keep on thinking even if I take the job it will be flexible in terms of where to work from. It has to be, it’s a modern start up that works mainly online. I’ll ask Douglas by message on Monday about the specific salary breakdown and the hybrid work arrangement — whether there’s possibilities of working remotely for an extended period of time. In that case I could do work while also doing the presentations.
Looking at the pros now. Steady income, and I think one with rather large potential from what he said in the interview. Again, I need to ask for the contract details because it could be all fluff with no basis. But then again they are hiring people with so much potential that if it’s not an attractive offer no one would accept. The second is that I saw from the groupchat of the meetup on the 21st of August (for which I still need to book my flights — 150 fucking euros) there’s quite a few pretty, young girls. Not to say I’m thinking of going for my coworkers but they must have friends. That’s the thing that excites me about this job. They’re hiring people like me, and I want to meet people like me. So I think there’s no better job opportunity than one with a bunch of recent uni graduates. Another pro, slightly unrelated, but still there nonetheless is that Sasha is moving there. Now I know she has a guy, and I like neel and usually with these situations it’s always the same thing. I get excited that a girl is moving to london but then we end up seeing each other like twice. It’s like Vicki this year, the Turkish girls which basically saw like once or twice, and Sasha Kristofovicova which even tho I didn’t really try to make any plans I thought I would see more of her, and I didn’t even see her once. So just because sasha hornakova is coming does not mean at all that she will be a big part of my life. Even though I would like to. And I have a big feeling if we have the opportunity alone we definitely would get together. Holy shit I’d love to get with her. She’s so beautiful. She’s crazy but damn. She’s going to be going to Uni so like I could always arrange plans after uni to go for a drink or something, idk. Or even if i hang out with Linda and Laura then odds are she will be there too because she’s friends with them. I feel really bad for Laura because I really got the ick for her and she’s so nice to me and she’s like offering for me to stay at her apartment in the city of london and I just think of her and I get a little disgusted. Idk what it is but It makes me guilty. She doesn’t know I slept with her flatmate and best friend, three times.., and that I’m trying to lay it on her other friend that’s coming to london. The more I think about it the more I’m truly lucky to have her, I’m a complete asshole for the way I treat her and take advantage (even though she doesn’t realise it) but she’s been hella clutch.
Idk the more I think about it the more I come to terms for the idea of starting the job in london. At least while I wait for the visa. Once I get the visa then I’ll figure it out. I’ll have money saved up as well (hopefully) which is good because I’m draining my shit quickly...
I keep on thinking about how many options I have in life right now. And how thinking like butterfly effect, the choice I make right now will set me down a totally different life than a different one I could choose. I think I just have to be open minded but be rational, and not let emotions guide my decisions. I have time. I am young. I want to enjoy my life while still doing the best for my future. I think I need to get the contract for the job and make sure it is as flexible as I hope and has a reasonable earning potential, then I will confirm.
Wednesday, August 16, 2023 at 10:56 PM (GMT+1)
Hey
Right now I’m chilling in the living room in cadafais home alone and reading. Mom rn is in Porto or somewhere nearby with her “friends” which i really think includes her boyfriend or whatever he is, I have not heard or seen a single thing about him other than that Pedro one time saw my mom with a dude on a date and the other day I was on my moms phone to call my own phone and I saw she had a contact on favourites called Joao   and it’s not my contact. Who cares one day she’ll decide to tell us, or more likely one day it will become so obvious enough that we will just know about it and she won’t have to ever tell us. Looking back I kind of respect my dad when he took me and my brothers on a dinner with Cynthia to meet her for the first time. I can imagine it must have been a difficult thing to do. Oh well.
I’ve been home for a solid 2 weeks straight. Itfeels kinda loser to say that but on the other hand I don’t really care too much. I haven’t been at home for this long in such a long time. I think it’s giving me an important reset that I needed.
I realize that in these diary entries I often talk about what’s on my mind and don’t actually mention the little day to day details that I’ll want to one day read back and be like “oh I remember !”, so I’ll see if I can start just mentioning useless shit that has happened over the last couple of days. Ozzy hasnt been eating his food for the last 3 days, he’s been acting a bit lethargic but he eats anything else just not dog food. He’s almost 10 which is crazy, I obviously love him and he’s been a part of the family for long but I feel like this is a very fucked up thing to say but I just don’t think i have any
    31

 major memories of him. Like he’s always been such a background dog, little charisma little personality. Like I feel bad talking about him like this especially because I know he doesn’t have much longer but I’m coming to terms with him passing away, similar to how I did with Fred right towards the end. Idk I feel bad for him but I just don’t know what to do, it’s like he’s in his own brain and doesn’t really react to stuff. Regardless, I’d want him to have as good of a life right towards the end as possible. He’s still part of the family and I’m still going to be very sad when he’s gone. It feels like I’m trying to convince myself saying that.
A couple of days ago I booked my flights to see Silvia in Switzerland in September. Super excited I actually do miss hanging out with her so much. She’s probably one of the chillest girls to go on trips with. I hope this weekend will respark the almost best-friend relationship we used to have and have her be someone that would go on these spontaneous trips with me. I also don’t know what her situation with Emmett is, I don’t see her talking about him often, I don’t see any photos of him on her insta or anything connecting them both together. Maybe they broke up. Honestly, I think I would probably want to get with Silvia (definitely make out but idk about sex with her) but I’m not sure if it would be a good idea. I’m definitely not going to force it. If it comes it will come naturally. Though now that I write that the thought came up in my mind: everytime I’ve had that mindset I’ve always been very passive with the subtle hints and then nothing happens and I think back that I should have been more direct with my desires. We’ll see, I’m not stressing too much over it. She’s texting with me a little different from before, she wrote the other day that she’s going to propose a plan while I’m there and then she was like “Not proposing literally don’t get ur hopes up” I don’t know if that slight flirting is new or whether that’s how she’s always been and I just haven’t talked with her in a while, or whether I’m just over thinking that shit. Probably the last. Either ways I’m very excited. 2 days is literally perfect. And she said the moment I arrive we go drink.
I also booked another trip, this time to Miami in February to see Natalie. Going for 8 days, I’m also suuuper excited for that. She has an apartment there which I think is by the beach, and I haven’t been to Miami since I was like 10 so I don’t remember shit. That one is going to definitely be a fun trip. I was looking at renting cars with Turo and it’s quite cheap to rent a good luxury car there.
I just realized that I think I spend so much of these diaries just speaking about the future and what could be and what I want to happen and so on, I feel like I barely ever talk about the present. I also think I’m super over analysing today. Sometimes I feel like I do that too much. I also think I realised over the last few days something, I think I have crazy control issues. Like I have to be in control of things. This thought stems from the fact that I get this horrible feeling in my stomach when a stranger at a club is able to seduce a girl that I’m trying to get with that I’m just friends with, for example the guys in clubs in Portugal and Vicki, as well as a long time ago Sissi and the Russian hockey player guy that went to BISB fuck I can’t remember his name, whatever. I feel like in those situations I have no control and no power and that makes me feel so bad and vulnerable. The same with planning things, Im always the one that organizes events and plans shit. I think this is obviously a good trait to be proactive and want to do things my way, but I think it can become a negative thing very quickly, especially when it comes to things that I ultimately have very little control over, such as girls. I can do my best to get them attracted to me but at the end of the day they are free to do whatever they want and could get with a random guy if the wish.
I also feel like these days recently I’ve become too “overly” generous. I ball out too much with girls, but them shit and all that stuff. Especially girls that invite that behavior, such as Vicki and Biba, but also Juli and so on. The problem with paying for them is that if I’m not getting pussy then what the fuck am I paying for? Spending time time them? Like I’m thinking about it and I actually think splurging my money on them creates an idea in their head that I’m just a guy that will pay for their shit and they don’t have to give me anything in return. That was the root of all the stress with Vicki. Because I was spending so much money and literally paying for almost everything and I got literally 0 pussy. Again, I’m not entitled to get any pussy by paying for a girls meal or some shit, but my weak mentality to not cut that shit out and put my foot down makes me enter that friend zone like that. I know that I have it in me to be able to get what I want. I just need to have the balls to speak up when I need to speak up, and to do the things that in the moment might be awkward but that will pay off after. I need to do more risky shit when it comes to relationships. And I think being a “nice and generous” guy is the exact opposite. That’s still something I definitely need to work on. I’m reading a book now about how to stop being a nice guy. It says that essentially this personality trait stems from abandonment issues as a child, that I crave the desire and attention of women. I think it is perfectly spot
on. It’s crazy how I talk to so many girls like this. I know this is a lot of girls to talk to at once. Like I’m a fuckboy in the number of girls that I text but then in terms of actually fucking these girls it’s not that good. I try to understand why it is that I don’t attract relationships, and I think it’s because I don’t allow myself to be vulnerable enough, so girls never know how I truly feel, and so nothing ever progresses. And that’s another trait of being a nice guy, I hide my true desires and emotions for the sake as being perceived as the cool and funny and exciting one. The problem is that I don’t do it on purpose. This has become so engrained in my mentality that it’s hard for me to not behave that way. Everytime I make a breakthrough with a girl is because I have acted different from my usual self. Thinking about Juli, it was only when I was doing the whole Spanish thing with her and being much more demanding that we were able to start having good sex. The same with Linda b, only when I actually started blatantly flirting and complimenting her did she start wanting to have sex with, as per what she told me. Or with Linda K the moment I told her I liked her and wanted to get with her she began acting differently and we made out the next time we saw each other. So there is a pattern here. I need to be more vulnerable and direct. And I don’t mean pulling a linda k again because I feel like that’s a last resort method, rather I should pull a Linda b method, starting to directly compliment the girl: “you look beautiful”. Those words are so difficult to get out of my mouth before I’ve actually gotten with a girl. I’m so scared of opening up and risking a rejection, even when I know that they might feel the same way. I hope this book gives me some good tips on how to change my mentality and behavior in this aspect. I also hope that I can apply those changes and start getting more of what I want. I don’t want to be talking to 6 different girls and all with a potential of smashing, I want to be talking to one or max two that I am smashing and that I want to talk to.
32

 Anyways I’ve written so much right now. I wasn’t even sure if I should write a diary entry today. Guess it was worth it
Also, I’m going to London on Saturday for 4 days to do the meet up with the team. I’m staying with Linda but I feel like I’m barely going to get to see her, especially from the way she’s been telling me, saying that her schedule is crazy and I think she usually spends her free time with Michal so who knows. I’d like to spend a bit of time with her. I’d like to smash as well of course but I’m not going to force it, she told me the other day that “unfortunately her hot girl summer is over” as in she’s a bit committed now. You never know, I also think if she wanted to she would be down because she knows I wouldn’t tell, and Michal wouldn’t know. But then again how good of a relationship must it be if she’s going to hook up with me and not tell him.
Oh well, just wanted to mention that before I went. Peace
Sunday, August 27, 2023 at 11:32 PM (GMT+2)
Hi,
Right now I’m on the plane coming from Barcelona back to Lisbon after spending the weekend with Dad and Cynthia and my brothers for my dads birthday. It was a relatively poor weekend at face value - the weather was horrible, our hotel was quite far from the centre and we didn’t have a car either, which led to a bit of a disappointing experience to what I think my dad expected. I feel a little bad, I really do appreciate the gesture and know he spent so much money on everything just to spend a weekend with us. It really is sad this is how growing up is. These days you don’t see your parents every day like you used to in the holidays or even during the year when you went to school. Now it’s a matter of a couple of days every couple of months. And when you extrapolate that by the amount of years they still have as parents, rather than grandparents where you’re taking care of them more than they take care of you, it is not that much time you spend with them. I really am happy for how happy he is with Cynthia. I feel bad for not being able to tell him these feelings, as they raised us in such a way to never be emotionally vulnerable in this sense, but I do hope things continue like this for him and that he lives a happy life. I would like my mom to move on the same way he did, but I think my mom, being alone in cadafais most of her time, is “becoming older” faster than my dad. It’s sad to think that, but I think that my confidence in wanting to become more emotionally open with the family and mention address the things we usually keep under the rug is getting stronger, and I see myself growing the desire to speak up about these things, for their own self interest. The problem is that I think this now when I’m alone thinking but when it comes to real life facing them it’s really hard to get the conversation started, and I just don’t have the same ability to communicate myself in portuguese like I do in English. I wouldn’t be able to explain my points and be persuasive like I think I would in English. I guess that doesn’t really give me an excuse to not put the effort to try.
Tomas is becoming more open with me, more than with Pedro I think, he mentioned the other day he was Netflix and chilling with a girl, and I mention some of my experiences with girls as well. I’m glad about that. Maybe we’re all growing up and learning that there is a whole side to our brotherhood relationships that we didn’t experience due to the emotional vacancy we had. I think it’s only going to get better when Pedro moves to london and we have lunches together every Sunday like me and Tomas were doing last year.
On that note, a couple of days ago I had the bar meet up with the Quaxitas hires. So good. Couldn’t have been nicer people. Everyone was cool, and they were all incredibly smart, at my level or higher. But the fact that they knew how to chat and how to joke around truly sealed the deal for me. The only thing I’m sad about is that there won’t be that many of them working in the office everyday with me - most of them being online interns or part time people that will only come to the office a couple times a week. The full time people seemed amazing though. Anton, this Russian dude, was the first guy I met and we instantly hit it off. A party guy himself, a sexist and racist guy too, made me so excited to see how this dude entering my life will change things. The other guy, which I forgot how to spell his name, looked 21 but was 32. He was such a nice guy and someone who I think I will learn so much from. Honestly I could say something like this for literally everyone I spoke to. I had such a good time. Tomorrow at 10 AM I have a zoom call with the team again, don’t know what it’s about but as we left the bar Douglas was telling me privately that he was considering hiring more of the people, as a lot of the people I met were competing for the same spot. He seemed unsure, and Paula seemed to be more pragmatic and against the idea. I was sad because the more of these people I saw everyday the more fun and the better experience I would have. I guess we’ll see tomorrow. Finally the last thing I wanted to write about was about my mental situation right now. I’ve been finding myself very overthinking and anxious with my love life right now. I haven’t been speaking to that many girls, at least by the standard that I became a little used to when the tide is high, but I find myself so much more worried about what I post and the image girls are taking, and what they think about me and all that shit. I don’t like it at all. I’m in a weird position where a lot of my strongest “leads” I have to keep in touch through Instagram. But they live in other countries, so I have to always plan trips to go and see them. But planning trips is a fucking pain in the ass. Vicki said her dad is moving to SF so she would be down to go on a trip with me from SF to LA. I’d like that, a lot, but I find that I overthink every message I send to her, and that I feel like I’m always the one hitting her up and I’m giving off poor value, because at a certain point how much am I trying to force it?but I know deep down there’s a chance I’m overthinking it and I have to be persistent with this otherwise these trips never realise. It’s the same with Linda k. If I don’t almost do everything myself and just tell her dates then it never works. My dilemma is that I think these girls are bad for my mental health yet they are the girls is speak to the most. I want to smash them out of a purely self fulfilling purpose, as I can never be able to date them if I don’t live in the same country. I also create this image than I’m a man
    33

 whore that tries to get with all the girls, which has its own truth, but the problem in my opinion is that I pride myself in that. And my level of extreme honesty and directness is that I almost brag about it to the same girls I’m trying to get with. It gives them the wrong idea about me. And then the way I behave around them isn’t congruent with the personality I project. I want to meet girls from different cultures. Girls who aren’t cute spoiled little princesses that have daddy issues that lead to them acting in ways that makes me anxious and jealous. I like Vicki, a lot, but everytime I text her I just start feeling anxious, almost in a jealous boyfriend sense, that someone else is going to get with her instead of me. But she makes great chat. And then I start overthinking whether this is because she is interested in me or whether this is how she texts every guy, so it makes me incredibly careful with what I reply to her, and then I always worry afterwards whether my last message made her less interested in me. I know that the best way is for me just not to care. I shouldn’t care whether she’s texting 8 other dudes like she texts me. My stupid brain tells that she, like most pretty girls, lead on a lot of dudes as a mechanism of approval. Almost the same way that I have a desire to talk to a lot of girls as a way of getting approval that I am good enough. But then when I talk to her and learn about her past I learn over and over that she isn’t a hoe by any means, she hasn’t slept with many guys, and she truly has a good emotional handle of herself. When I went to london I was talking to Jonas and I told him about the trip how I didn’t get to smash and a big part of it from my perspective was because she had just (2or 3 months) broken up with her bf. Jonas made me realize how that is so rare in a girl to truly “work on herself” after a heartbreak. And the fact she reads and wants to work on herself made me so attracted to her. I don’t know whether this is an infatuation from spending a week with her every day but never getting to truly “know” her - meaning both intellectually, emotionally and physically, so I crave what I wasn’t able to have, or whether I actually found a girl that truly is different and sparked something in me I haven’t felt in a very long time. As I write this in the back of my mind I know I should tell her how I feel, but I don’t know what the game plan would be... If she said she also felt a connection then what? Do we do long-distance? Obviously not, doomed from the start. Do we both accept circumstances don’t allow us to be together and try to move on? In that case wouldn’t a trip to California just be fueling a relationship with no course and make it more painful? Or alternatively, what if she doesn’t feel the same way as me and I just read her wrong the whole time? I guess that would provide closure, but I don’t think anyone would be making plans to spend a week holidays with someone if they didn’t have any attraction the other.
Deep down I want to spend time with her so much that I’m willing to sacrifice telling her how i feel. But I’m worried the longer I wait the more likely she is to move on and get these feelings for another guy. Fuck it’s a tough pickle.
I think the best course of action is to see with Douglas ASAP if/when I can take the trip for a week, or if anything just 5 days. Then I’ll tell her and try to get stuff booked and if it she flakes or I see that the trip just isn’t possible then I’ll tell her how I feel, more in a “I can’t speak to you for my own sake” vibe. But then it appears like I’m just trying to get a reaction out of her. It’s way more impactful, and more meaningful, if I tell her before she says she can’t go on the trip. I don’t know... it just seems so kamikaze... I need to think it through. Anyways I’ve written a short essay so I’ll end it here. Bye bye
End of August 2023
  34

 September 2023
Sunday, September 10, 2023 at 11:58 PM (GMT+1)
Hi
I’m writing this in bed in Linda/Laura’s flat in London. Very interesting last week or so. I don’t even know where to start. I started working this week. Honestly, the people there are incredible. The other people working with me are suuuuper chill and they drink party do drugs and shit. There’s two girls that are kinda pretty- chiara and Lucy. Chiara has a bf but I Lowkey felt a strong vibe when we all went out on Friday to celebrate the first week of work. We sat next to each other almost entirely throughout the night and were chatting the whole time. I was a bit sad because she didn’t smoke weed anymore but Anton told me she told him she does Ket, which is also pretty cool. I like these girls that like to get shitfaced (and are experienced). I think chiara has had some crazy history, I think she was a bit of a party monster in the days. She has a pretty face and a hilarious personality. Definitely want to spend more time with her. But honestly I don’t think I find her attractive to want to hit. Just want to have chill friends. She wanted to bring me and Anton with her to her friends bday party, but it ended up not working out because Douglas wanted to go as well (which I think is so weird for a boss to think it’s acceptable to want to go to a party with a employee they only know for a week. I don’t know if he didn’t realize that a party like that is just full of drugs everywhere or if he just wanted to go out and doesn’t care about the drugs — I think it’s the former) but I hope there will be a next time. We briefly texted as I came home but then I replied to her and said we could all have drinks at my flat after work this week but she didn’t open the message... she’s those kind of girls... then again she has a boyfriend so it could be that, but then again my message was only friendly, as I knew if I tried to shoot my shot and she didn’t reply it would be hella awkward. Like this it’s chill I’ll just bring it up that she’s somehow an even worse texter than me.
Anyways, i still need to see on Thursday how I can get the people to come to my place. I feel bad if I don’t invite Douglas and Paula and I think if they found out they would act weird (Anton made a good point that he thinks Douglas is trying to live his teenage party years through us) but it’s so stupid not to realize the dynamics of boss/worker.
The job itself i still don’t know. I don’t know if it’s that easy to place someone, and how long it will take. The job seems a bit like you’re just scouring LinkedIn the whole day, but I’m still open minded and I trust Douglas does mean what he says. He’s a very very nice person and I think he is definitely someone I like to work for, but boundaries between boss and friend need to be established before things get weird and he might start getting resentful that we don’t see him the same way we see each other. I’m also worried a lot of the part time people (which includes pretty much all the pretty and fun girls) are starting to question the actual opportunities of this job. Chiara told me she had applied for a job on Friday and Anton also mentioned his worries. Again, I think the problem here is that Douglas didn’t set expectations correctly. He made a lot of bold promises and statements and now that the part time people saw what a week of work is like they got a sense of reality and see that it’s not going to be as straight forward and quick money as they thought. I don’t want them to leave cause they’re cool ass people to work with. Then again if they bring in new people I’m probably gonna vibe with them as well. I think Douglas should try to get a deal sorted soon so that he can start paying base salary to the part time workers, providing some incentive (it’s 10 ph for 8 hours, 2 days = 160 per week: 500 per month).
Anyways, Anton, another coworker, also incredibly chill. We smoked together until 4 am and I showed him the city. Really smart and interesting guy, and also does Md, weed, and he does acid a lot - I might try it with him some day. All the others are super cool as well. I could say something nice about all of them.
Overall, I’m happy with work so far but I’ll have a better idea of what to expect over the next weeks.
On Saturday (yesterday) I went with Connor to livs party in Kent. Went there with basically no expectations and it was really good. The people were really nice. There were two of her friends that were pretty and single. She has a really nice place and had a crazy set up for the party, with an icecream van and horse stable and everything. I wanted to get with Livs friend Daisy but as the night went on Liv was showing interest towards me so I just decided to fuck it and go for her. We just made out but it was nice, she’s a very cool girl as well. It’s a shame she’s not a bit skinnier cause she would be a 9. I liked the most that I got high as shit with conor (she also took a couple of hits so maybe she was also a bit high) but then when we went back to the big tent for 8 people there were two single mattresses opposite each other and since there were people in the room (including her brother) I didn’t know whether she would want me to sleep with her. But she lied down on the mattress and tapped the mattress as in to tell me to join her. It was soooo nice sleeping cuddling with someone the whole night. This is exactly how I would want the night to end if I was on MD or high. It’s so peaceful and cozy, and the day after me and her were super chill, neither one made it awkward. The posh British accent was such a new experience for me while hooking up it was so hot. It just sounds so nice and makes them sound so... I don’t even know how to describe it. Like it’s hot but sounds but also makes her sound like she’s rich, and at the same time a little bit like she’s experienced (almost like a hooker). Anyways, it was an overall great weekend
Next weekend is gonna be interesting too. Going to Switzerland to see Silvia. Who knows how that’s gonna go. definitely excited.
Sasha hornakova is coming on Thursday to London. I won’t be there on the weekend but she sent me a message that shes tired from life and wants to go clubbing with me to turn off her brain. Honestly idk how that’s gonna work. If i go on Thursday with her it will just be me and her without Laura, which would allow me to hook up with her, but then I would need to miss Friday work, which would actually be ideal because i am flying that day as well. If we go out Monday then Laura will be here which means she will cock block me and plus I don’t have much MDMA for all of us. And the events on Monday are probably horrible
I’ll see, probably Thursday will be smarter, but I need to figure out the game plan, because If it’s just me and her (and maybe neel and other friends, but I doubt it) then I need to have a good plan
    35

   Monday, September 18, 2023 at 11:22 PM (GMT+1)
Hi
I’m on the Heathrow express coming back from Lausanne. Flight got cancelled yesterday so I had to take the train back to Lausanne and ended up staying a full other day. I feel incredibly broke right now, even though I barely spent any money there. It was really fun. Me and Silvia didn’t hook up or anything. I think I could have if I had made a move but she was still with Emmett and when she told me about her situation, how she’s planning on breaking up with him (she was going to do it right after I left, idk if she ended up doing it... I’ll text her tomorrow) but she mentioned how there’s this 26 year old in Dubai she kissed and has some feelings for, she’s going in 2 weeks and she’s staying at his place... when she told me that she kissed him you could tell she really felt bad and she said she felt so guilty and like a bitch and so on. It would be a bit of a dick move if I then tried to kiss her after she just said how bad she feels about cheating. Anyways we still basically did every other possible disgusting thing to each other - from pouring water on each others head in bed and then making it stink up, to drinking gin tonic in the bed and making each other eat food from the ground, dry scoop seasoning, and so on. Honestly I don’t even know why I was so keen on doing that shit and why she reciprocated. Lowkey it’s because since there’s so much pent up sexual energy we were just doing debotchery to each other as a proxy. We did also cuddle and I literally spent my entire day today in my underwear only and her wearing a tshirt and panties. I’m a bit torn whether I should have made a move or not, but she is coming to london to see me in 3 weeks, where she wants to try MDMA for the first time (still need to plan that shit out, I’ll want to make sure I plan it such that I don’t get cockblocked or that some shit like Laura trying to hook up with me or Dado spending the entire evening with her happens). We also talked about doing a bunch of trips together (Israel, US, and she seems equally if not more down to be trip buddies), so it might have been a good thing for me to have not made an explicit move. That being said I’m still pissed because every moment I spend where she can tell I want to hook up but I don’t have the courage to actually do it, it just makes me look less confident and lower self esteem, which is why we have never even kissed before even though we must have slept in the same bed alone around 10-15 times. It’s also because she hold sex with such an emotional attachment, we talked about it for a long time while we discussed her romantic life at the moment. She seemed to be receptive and want to change and live a “crazy and spontaneous” sexual life. I think her coming to UK is definitely a hook up trip for her. I also think on MD and me being responsible for her will make it easy for me to transition to kissing, all I have to do is say the right thing and then once we kiss one time it’s gonna take over without me having to do anything, especially since as of right now the sexual tension is so high.
I also met all of her friends and then on Sunday we went out for a bar where we met up with Simon and Alem. Really really good time, and everyone truly enjoyed it. It made me really happy how wholesome the entire interaction was and how we all were catching up.
Now that I’m heading home I’ll be seeing Laura. She’s been difficult to text recently, maybe she’s loyal right now and is trying to keep her distance. I’m gonna see her in 45 minutes so we’ll see how that goes. Probably won’t see Sasha at all, more like certainly won’t see her. She’s having a good time with her man so I don’t care too much either. And I also had a great time this weekend so who gives a shit if I don’t see her — I’ll see her again soon. I’m starting to read Models, it’s making me realize how much I crave for other peoples approval, especially girls. I think that’s the root of all my issues in my romantic life. I hope I can read that book until the end because I think it could really help me.
Anyways, tomorrow I’m back to work and I feel like it’s gonna be a pain in the ass tomorrow (honestly I think it’s more tje pressure and energy from Douglas that makes it a pain). But fuck it we move on.
Wednesday, September 20, 2023 at 11:51 PM (GMT+1)
Yo
Just writing this right now to brainstorm some stuff. Just came back from dinner with Bernardo and Bruna and their parents in the new flat. Looks good - I’m happy. I really liked the vibe and fuck me braziilians just know how to live life. Soooo chill and funny.
I’d like to stay there for sure but there’s really only a couple of problems:
1. My room is a single bed
2. Bruna is only staying until end of December
3. The room is kinda expensive
Let’s go in order to think about solutions
The room is a single bed, which is a bit fucked up because I’m going to have girls over - especially in 3 weeks when Silvia comes... so idk wtf I’m gonna do. Maybe I’m gonna see if I can get a double mattress. I think I could - i just looked a photo and think it would fit, but the problem is that wtf would I do with the other bed? And I don’t want to spend money on a mattress.... I lowkey need a double bed
Bruna is leaving in December but. What am I to do about it. She seems great and lowkeyyyy id tap. Not fully sure I would need to be with her without her parents to get the vibe but I think I would want to and she’d be down potentially. She has a bunch of hot friends as well so that’s fucking amazing. Makes it all worth it
Finally the room is a bit expensive especially me being so uncertain with my employment and low on Monday but anywhere I go it will be the same if not more expensive. I think it’s worth it. If I quit my job and just go off tutoring I think I could always ask to be a bit more flexible, but again, I think there’s no other alternative that would be better. The only thing better would be to stay for free, but obviously that’s not a real possibility.
End of September 2023
      36

 October 2023
Thursday, October 5, 2023 at 3:04 AM (GMT+1)
Hellooo how are u
I wanted to write this rn because it’s been a interesting last few days since I wrote the last entry. I’m writing in my double massive ass bed with the red LEDs on the side and the painting of the random dude with no eyes and mouth directly above my head. If it falls it’s gonna hurt. I have a feeling shit will go very well for the foreseeable future. I’ve been living with Bernardo and Bruna for the last 4 days now and I’m so happy. I think I’m finally switching up from the desire to go out with the Slovaks all the time as like the “foundation” group if that makes sense. I really feel like this is a huge change that’s coming. I vibe so much with Brazilians. It makes so much sense, when I was 10-11 it shaped so much of my foundation of Personality and I never realized this type of life could exist. They party, they’re experienced, they are sooo nice and real, I think I’m falling in love with the idea of potentially going back there to live. I haven’t actually sent out my visa application to Australia yet... part of it is because I’ve been so busy this week but I’ve also not wanted to do it because it’s so expensive and I’m so broke, and now today it’s because I’m now slightly considering the idea of going to Brazil in January to live and work for a while... I technically can apply to Australia within 2 years of graduating so it’s June 2025 the latest... I have time. I need to speak to my dad about this, but for some reason everything has just clicked in my brain over the last few days and today especially. It’s exactly what I need in my life.
Australia will be great, but it will take me time to adjust and perhaps a long time until I find a job, find friends I like and all that shit. In Brazil if my dad is there I can live for free, I can find a job that pays fine or I can even just do tutoring and live like a king, and I think the girls in Brazil are what i need to fix my ideas about girls that are mostly based on Slovak girls.
I don’t know I have such a great feeling about this and the money issue just disappeared when I realized I can be living with my dad if I want and not pay rent. I’m really tired so I need to go to sleep but there’s more id like to say. The gist of it though is that it seems like the perfect solution to everything I’ve been thinking about for the last few months and everything I’m looking for in a place to live (weather, people, rent, partying, etc)
Alright goodnight
Sunday, October 8, 2023 at 10:29 AM (GMT+1)
Yo
I’m writing because eu tou feeling muito weird right now and don’t know how to verbalize what I’m feeling. Last night I took Bernardo Bruna and Paula to Tabu, it was a shit night at the club bc there were so many Asians and the drinks were expensive and the queue took over an hour — it was just shit. Eu pensava and I was feeling that a Paula was down to hook up do começo da noite. Eu não sei how I feel about her, but I definitely would have been down to kiss. A noite went by and we came back e a Bruna convenceu ela para dormir over pq era mais safe. As we come back from the club in the taxi agente tava seating next to each other and like I had my hand in her leg and she was also reciprocating the touches and everything, but then we come back home e idk the afters was um pouco weird, ninguém fumava e a Paula é against drugs e sei la o set up era weird - nao ha TV, the couch is really small, the music tava loud, I don’t know eu estava um pouco uneasy, mas then eu falo like eu tou com vontade de fumar e o bernardo and Paula were like dw we won’t judge, e depois fomos lá para fora and a Paula tava seating on the double chair e eu estava no rocking chair. Daí o bernado perguntou like ah posso sentar ao teu lado para apanhar o calor and she obviously was like yeah e entao they sat together. And then obviously they slowly started to move more together and eventually ele tinha a mão dele on her thigh e ela tava leaning her head on his shoulder. Eu fiquei feeling tão estranho. Part of it I think is because I feel and wish it would be me. I know that had I done things different it would be me and her. But eu também fiquei feeling for the first time in my life like I was third wheeling and I felt like the thing I needed to do was leave to let them two be alone. It was so difficult because I felt like I wanted to stay outside and talk but if I would do that I’d be literally cockblocking Bernardo and even though I wanted her as well I had to accept she preferred Bernardo over me. And so I think I did the right thing and I said I was too cold so I was going to bed. They agreed and decided to start cleaning up. I went to bed but then I just felt so uneasy - the same way I feel right now- I don’t know if it’s like a body reaction to knowing I had the potential to get with her so I’m feeling the energy and the uneasiness, similar to Ozzy when a lily is on heat. Mas tambem eu sinto kind of very dissappinted in myself. I know I did the right thing by leaving but it was such a selfless thing that I had to do but I didn’t want to. I don’t know if they did anything - I don’t know if they kissed or if they slept in the same bed or if they fucked and all that shit. Sinceramente I realized how much I was overthinking in my own head when I went back out to grab my phone and I thought they had gone to the same room already but they were still cleaning and there was this platonic energy I was feeling. Also like 15 minutes ago Bernardo came out (I’m writing this outside in the balcony)
      37

 because he saw my door was open. It didn’t seem like he had hooked up with her.
Either ways I feel so weird, kind of sad and kind of dissappinted and I think with a lot of FOMO because I know it could have been me. I don’t know what to do, but I feel like I wouldn’t care too much knowing whether he hooked up with her or not. Fodase but eu acho que eu tenho que começar a pensar mais how i present myself when I’m with girls that don’t do drugs and shit because I think I fucked up my perception of Paula from trying to be the crazy party guy and whatever. I honestly don’t know how to phrase what I’m thinking. I’ll leave it at that, I’ll be fine.
Sunday, October 22, 2023 at 8:13 PM (GMT+1)
Hello
It’s been a long and eventful last couple of weeks. I don’t even know where to start. Right now I’m laying in the couch in the living room of the new flat in Camden tired as fuck. Last weekend Silvia and Lucy came to visit me in London. I don’t even know how to explain it. We went to drumsheds and they tried mdma for the first time with me. I was with Silvia most of the time and convinced her to have a casual thing with me and we spent a lot of the time in the club making out while leaving Lucy with Louis dancing. The club was so good, it was hontestly such a good night. They didn’t allow gum inside so Silvia kept chewing the same one she had the whole night and I just asked to have her gum, which i know is a trick that always works. We kept passing the gum back and forth between each other. It was so gross but so hot.
We came back at 9.30 Pm and Bernardo was with Pablo his friend and they had just eaten dinner and we’re gonna leave to Paula’s for pre drinks at 10.30 pm. At this point I had sobered up from the md but Lucy wanted to go out. So we went to Paulinha’s for pre drinks because they were going to Fabric. We get there and it’s nice the girls get along and it’s great. We still don’t have gum so I mention we need gum. The closest shop was 10 minutes away so me and Silvia said we would go there and come back. Bro we left and just started tonguing each other the whole time. It was unreal this girl was so different once she showed her true colours. We got to the shop and bought the gum and a bottle of wine. At this point we had already been clubbing for 7 hours, still feeling the after effects of mdma and had drank like retards just before going to Paula’s. So we were drunk as hell. But we then started just wandering around the area and just making out wherever had a nice corner. It was so fucking nice and both of us were really annoyed that Lucy was here too because we wanted to be alone. Fast forward 1 hour we still haven’t gone back to the Pres and people are texting us to come back and all that shit. I finally sent my live location and they find us in a bar that was already closed where I was talking with some friends of the bartenders and Silvia was slurring arguing with the bartender about how Roma is better than Tottenham. We go home but Silvia wanted to go sleep in her brothers flat. So us 3 go there but Silvia was so gone we didn’t know which floor it was on and it turned out the keys we had were missing the actual door key... anyways We give up and go back to my home and die in our separate beds. Silvia sleeps in brunas room, Lucy went to the couch because Silvia was snoring, and I slept in my room.
The morning after we wake up and we just rot in brunas bed for a while. Then we go to angel again and get the good keys to her brothers room and then go for dinner in soho house with Sofia, one of Lucy’s friends from EHL. This is Sunday. Monday they fly out back to Lausanne and then Wednesday they were flying to Paris, where I’d meet them on Thursday.
Bro at this point I knew it would be fun but I had no idea what would happen. In the 2 days I was in Paris I don’t even know how to describe it. The relationship I had with these girls was like a horny girlfriend that’s also your annoying sister. The gum thing became normalized between the three of us, with us taking gum from each others mouth and so on. The Friday night in Paris we started drinking me and Silvia at 2 pm by the Eiffel Tower. Again, surreal. The vibes truly were amazing. Lucy and I were touching each other quite a lot again, and me and Silvia clearly had a lot of sexual tension too, though it was kind of hidden in front of Licy. Comes to night time and we’re crashing from all the drinking but then we go to dinner and I feel a lot better. We’re at 3 bottles of wine at this point. We’re meant to meet Juli and her friend at 10 to go to a bar. On the walk there we decide to drink even more so we buy another wine bottle and drink it and then another one again and the walk was so fun.
In the bar it was nice and I really liked seeing Juli and her friend Viktoria but the other two girls were too fucked up and they were getting jealous I wasn’t giving them any attention. They were speaking in Spanish saying like “stop flirting with them” and kicking my legs for me to give them the gum from my mouth. Again, so fucking weird and gross but soooo fucking hot. We get 2 drinks and the girls want to dip because they want to go to the club, and they didn’t vibe too much with Julie and viktoria. We head to the club, which is 25 minutes walking. 5 minutes in Julie calls me saying Lucy forgot her HM bag. So I go back and I pick it up, and then I stay with Juli and viktoria for a while just to chat with them alone for a bit. In the meantime Lucy meets some people and they invite her and Silvia to go to their house party upstairs. Lucy goes but Silvia waits outside for me. I arrive and we try to make it inside but they didn’t want to let us in the apartment. Fair enough. Also, fuck French people they’re so annoying and pretentious. Me and Silvia decide to go check if there’s a top floor with a rooftop, which there’s not. And then we start making out in the top floor and then in the elevator back to the bottom. We get there and for some reason the building we were in had a toilet on the bottom floor at the end of the corridor. We go in there and then I’m like come in. And then Silvia’s like “if the door locks then we can do stuff”. Bro the fucking lock did not work I can’t believe how pissed I am thinking back. Changes everything. I know for a fact we would have fucked. For fucks sake I’m so pissed. We make out but nothing else and then fast forward to later Lucy leaves the house party and now we’re once again walking to the club. At this point as Silvia walks ahead I go to Lucy and I’m like let me get your gum and I just start making out with her to get her gum out of her mouth. Then a couple of minutes after we’re like ok now switch gums again and we make out. I swear Silvia knew exactly what was going on but she didn’t mention it and didn’t seem to care at all. Lucy never saw me and Silvia making out but she MUST know, otherwise she’s retarded.
Anyways we’re walking and Pierre calls Silvia, to which Silvia picks up but she’s like ahh I don’t want to talk to him, so she gives it to Lucy for her to talk to him and me and Silvia literally wait for her to walk a bit ahead and start again tonguing each other in an alleyway. She also is horny as shit and she shows me her tits in the middle of the street while walking. Honestly I didn’t look at them for so long to remember the size and shape but I was so turned on.
The club ends up being a dead end so we end up getting an Uber back to my place. This is 3 am at this point. We get home and I get in their air mattress and then Silvia is next to me facing me. We start cuddling. I’m only in underswear and I have my entire leg in between her legs. I convince Lucy to hit the dab pen and then me and Silvia hit it too. Now we’re all high as fuck in the tiny air mattress. We alll talk and laugh and all that shit and then we eventually fall asleep. Me and Silvia cuddle the entire night. I had my hand underneath her shirt a lot of the night too and without any doubt in my mind if Lucy was not in that room I would have smashed Silvia so easily. I’m really annoyed about that. The morning after silvia moves to the other single bed at like 9 am and me and Lucy now sleep together, we don’t cuddle. Then Lucy goes to make us breakfast, and then we eat Lucy showers and then comes lay with me again in the bed. As Silvia is showering and then changing me and Lucy are playing with each other and then I tell her to be my big spoon and she’s like no I’m always small spoon and then eventually I’m spooning her but soooo sexually. She’s wearing a crop top and I have my hand wrapped around her waist and she has her ass on my dick. I am only in underwear and there’s a blanket in between us. Then I start
    38

 biting her neck, to which I know she gets horny as fuck. Then I have my hand on her inner thighs but I knew I couldn’t do anything further with Silvia in the house, and I think at that point even in the room.
I still don’t understand how she didn’t care or didn’t mention anything. I was so obviously all over Lucy and she was being so receptive.
Later that day I flew back to London and they both stayed - until tomorrow. Now I’m in a weird post holiday state where I’m not sad or have regrets because I think I did as much as I could. I didn’t ask for a threesome again (I mentioned it to Silvia in the club in London but she said she was too selfish for that - which I believe) but I think I could have. Or I could have found a way to have fucked Silvia by creating a distraction for Lucy or changing the logistics in such a way we would have some time to be alone while she slept. But with the situation I was handed with both of them by their sides 24/7 this is all I was able to do.
Now I’m feeling weird because I want to fuck Silvia, and to a lesser extent Lucy too, but I don’t have a date set for the next time I see them, and I know I won’t be able to smash either of them unless I am alone with them for an extended period of time.
I might suggest a trip to Amsterdam with just Silvia. I wouldn’t mind Lucy going but then I won’t be able to smash and I need to...
I came back from the flight and went straight to meet the Czech people. It was fine it was a normal night, club that failed to get in but I liked seeing Natalie and Mikolaj. Maybe if I would have stayed in Paris I would have had more fun.. idk. I also am worried if I spend too much time with the two girls it’s gonna get boring so I need to only stay with them for short periods of time.
I also now have this feeling since i left and I saw how crazy they are when they are with me that they’re gonna sleep with other dudes. I shouldn’t be jealous about that, although it should have been me, but I think it’s the fact that we don’t message each other once I’m not there anymore that makes me question whether they behaved like that only to me or to other dudes too. I want to think no, because everything points to that but it’s the fact that they do shit always in the hidden that means I will never know, so I assume the worst even though I doubt that would be the case. I shouldn’t care. If I message them about it might come off as needy. Or maybe it would come off as me caring about them - because they might think they are just other girls to me. I think less is more in this situation.
Now the only thing is that I want to spend more time with them, specially I need to smash Silvia before she gets cuffed again. I think that I have set us up for a good dynamic for friends with benefits but I need to have sex with her to secure the deal and also to make me think less about her. I think I’m gonna text her tomorrow or the day after saying that we need to go on a trip just me and her to finish things off. I’m thinking Amsterdam or Spain or some shit like that. Need to figure that out.
There’s other shit going on right now. My graduation was on Wednesday and mom and dad talked to a while and seemed very happy, good for them. I’m thinking about moving out in November instead of December just because it’s too much money for me to be paying out of my pocket.
End of October 2023
  39
